The most visible expression of the lineage was surely the burial vault; the patron
of one of these was effectively a pariente mayor, and when a new branch had outgrown
its stem in terms of its wealth or power, it would signal its presence by establishing
a new vault, and thereby a new solar. Thus, when the famous Beltrán de la Cueva,
third son of a family of Ubeda, rose to fortune in the troubled politics of the fifteenth
century, becoming duke of Alburquerque, he established a new mausoleum for that
branch of the clan in his lordship of Cuéllar. ‘All else in this world is passing,’
proclaimed the bishop and chapter of Jaén as they authorised the lords of Garcíez
to found a new chapel for their lineage in the cathedral in 1412, but ‘these places of
194THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
burial remain for ever more as testimony to those for whom they were set up.’ The
chronicler Argote de Molina described one in these precincts in 1588, draped with
the ‘blazons and banners and coats of arms’ of its owner. 9
Tombs and burial chapels were costly. In the Dominican convent of Palencia
Antonio Ponz could still admire in 1787 the ‘sumptuous sculpture, with kneeling
figures’, of the marquis of Poza (died 1557) and his wife, and opposite, ‘another,
more grandiose tomb in black marble, which seems to be by the celebrated Leoni,
with kneeling figures’ of the succeeding marquis (died 1604) and his spouse. He
lamented that nowadays, through ‘meanness or want of piety...the most that
people will do is to place a sad stone with its epitaph over the grave’. 10 Spanish
funerary sculpture, in fact, seems to have followed the trend in Europe generally,
though perhaps at its own pace. The explosion of artistic investment during the
Renaissance period, celebrating the virtues of the founder, seems to have been
choked off by a new spirituality which found such hubris rather distasteful.
When Don Bernardo de Valdés, member of the aristocratic confraternity of the
Holy Charity of Seville, died in 1655, he left an endowment for its chapel on
condition that he was buried there under his coat of arms. The reforming Chief
Brother, Miguel Mañara, suggested—as the chapel neared completion in 1674—
that God would be better pleased if the money, ‘which was blindly to be used
for the commemoration of a dead man whom the worms had eaten’, was devoted
instead to the cult of Christ. It was agreed that Valdés would have, instead of
his elaborate tombs and coat of arms, a simple plaque with the inscription: ‘Here
lie the ashes of our well loved brother.’ 11 This Counter-Reformation spirituality,
with its interiorisation of piety, emerges well in the request of Don Luis de
Requesens (1573) for burial under a simple slab of marble, with just his name
and date of death, ‘so that those who read it and knew me in this life may
remember to say a prayer to God for my soul’.
Death represented, indeed, a prime opportunity for the solidarity of friends
and helpers to express itself. The diarist Jeroni Soria recalled the constant tolling
of bells and the cries of the heralds through the streets of sixteenth-century Valencia
for prayers at the deaths of the great ones of the land—a practice still followed for
ordinary citizens in the little communities of the region down to the early twentieth
century. 12 Funerals were dramatic affairs—the weeping women, described by the
traveller Lalaing in 1501–3, the knight dragging the standard of his dead comrade
through the dust while a throng dashed his shield ritually to the ground...The
processions perhaps reached a peak during the Baroque: those of the duchess of
Uceda in Madrid 1611, or of the marquesa of Armuña in Granada in 1633, where
‘one could hardly get through the streets for the crush of people’, attracted attention
by their splendour. Mourning dress identified the circle of friends. Thus when
the vice-chancellor of the Crown of Aragon, Don Simón Frígola, died in 1599,
‘all those of his house wore hoods, such as notaries, lawyers, doctors, barbers,
apothecaries and the like’. 13 While the corpse itself might be interred on the day
following death, elaborate gatherings of the clan would take place to express solidarity
195THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
with the bereaved for some time after that. Garibay recalled how, after the death
of his father in 1556, ‘his kinsmen and friends demonstrated their great emotion,
and they came up from all the surrounding towns, each in his own way, on different
days of this month (March) and the following one of April’. 14
Both the state and the church were nervous, each for its own reason, about these
demonstrations. Ferdinand and Isabel tried to restrict gatherings of the clan, worried
about the vendetta, and sixteenth-century bishops legislated against the caridades or
distribution of food at funerals. Major decrees of Philip II in 1565, implementing the
Council of Trent, limited to a dozen those kinsmen or friends who could hold candles
at the funeral procession and restricted mourning dress to those of the household.
These laws seem to have varied in their effect from region to region. They did not
apply, for example, in the Crown of Aragon. In general, the older established communities
of Old Castile and the north appear to have kept their semi-pagan customs longer
than the Reconquest areas of Valencia and Andalusia, where an evangelical church
shaped popular practice from a much earlier date. Thus the Valencian diarist Bernardo
Catalá, in his travels through the mountainous borderland of León and Asturias in
1606, noted: ‘it is the custom in these lands to leave few masses when they die, and
they give food to all the laity who go to the funeral, to each one a pound of bread,
together with three or four draughts of wine, and in some villages, cheese’. 15 By contrast,
the law of 1565 tried to foster the spiritual solidarity of the godly: one could have as
many members of one’s spiritual confraternities at one’s funeral as desired. The Council
of Trent, taking its stand against Protestant individualism, emphasised that salvation
was a collective phenomenon in part, and a sinner would do well to seek the help of
the prayers of the ‘saints’. As well as the confraternities, which came increasingly to
constitute a kind of alternative network of friends and which we shall explore in the
following chapter, the dying man or woman would rely on masses for the soul—2,588
were ordered on average by each town councillor of Madrid in the early seventeenth
century in his will. Capellanías, or chantries, became increasingly popular as perpetual
endowments of masses for the dead. The historian of Seville, Diego Ortiz de Zúñiga,
described their great number in the cathedral of that city in 1677, ‘and on the eve and
day of the commemoration of All Souls [2 November], so great a quantity of candles
and monuments and effigies are placed over the graves that the whole temple is turned
into a thick forest of torches and lights’. 16 The cult of the dead, in other words, absorbed
much of the energy and resources of Spaniards of the Golden Age. A traditional
solidarity survived quite well the attempts of church and state to prune it back, adapting
new forms of piety to old constraints of the family. It was really only in the later
eighteenth century that one notices a marked change here—a decline in the numbers
of masses for the soul and a greater emphasis on the inner preparation of the individual
soul before death.
If the cult of the dead helped reinforce the memory of a shared ancestry and a
common identity, the test of solidarity would come in the world of the living.
There is a certain contrast in testaments between the concern for property, identified
generally with the household, and the sense of kinship, which might extend more
196THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
widely. Thus the duke of Frías in 1612 asked his wife ‘most earnestly that in
everything relating to the upbringing and administration of my offspring, and in
all else of importance, she consult with and take the advice of the senior knights
and gentlemen of my lineage and house of Velasco, for they will be those who
with most love and commitment will look to its grandeur and enhancement’. At a
lower social level, the cloth trader Martín Fernández Cubero wrote from Mexico
to a nephew in Castile in 1572, explaining that he was no longer able to run his
business through advancing age and ill-health. ‘If a man doesn’t have someone to
take his affairs to heart and look after his property, everything goes badly’ he
explained; ‘I need a relative here, and I would make something of him.’ 17 Bernardo
Catalá had continual dealings with some—not all—of his kin, particularly with his
mother’s brother, Francisco Juan Catalá, who had been his tutor, and with his
maternal cousin, the powerful Don Juan Vivas de Cañamas, Spanish ambassador
to Genoa from 1600. Bernardo agreed to look after the Cañamas estates while
their owner was away in Italy; but when another cousin, Serafín Juan Catalá,
died in 1601, he noted in his diary that he would have to refuse the wardship of
the children, because he was too busy. Reluctantly, though, he agreed to become
guardian of the offspring of Uncle Francisco Juan, after the latter died later in
1601. The chief consideration seems to have been that he was reversionary heir
to this uncle’s estate. 18 The cycle of broken families, so typical of the Old Regime,
opened enormous possibilities of collaboration between kin, but also great opportunities
of conflict over inheritance.
Nothing perhaps contributed more to the fashioning of family structure than
the system of inheritance. It was in the nineteenth century, faced with rapid changes
to the inheritance laws in the name of greater egalitarianism, that sociologists in
various European countries began exploring the effects of these on the way society
itself developed. The name of Le Play is well known in the French context, but
hardly less meritorious was the work done for Spain by Joaquín Costa (1846–
1911). Costa’s great concern was to reform the economic and political life of his
country, and he attributed much of the poverty and instability to be found above
all in Castile to the splitting up of the family farm at the death of the father. By
contrast, in the old Crown of Aragon the law had favoured a single heir. ‘He is
not the heir just to enjoy life and do what he likes, but rather to ensure the continuity
of the physical and moral evolution of the family; he is a kind of serf tied to the
reputation of the name he bears, a servant of his aged parents and of his unmarried
aunts and uncles, whom he has to look after, and of his brothers and sisters,
whom he has to place in life and provide with a dowry.’ By following this model,
the Pyrenean family had helped shape ‘those characters at once inflexible, austere,
upright, thrifty and hard-working, and those habits of individual self-government,
which explain the admirable political history of Aragon’. 19 Costa was here tending
to overlook the less admirable aspects of Aragonese indiscipline—the banditry which
characterised the region in the early modern period—in favour of the long history
of freedom associated with it.
197THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
As was suggested above in Chapter 2, the inheritance systems of medieval Spain
tended to reflect the opportunities of the frontier, with a prevalence of subdivision
and egalitarianism among heirs—except, indeed, in the old-established Pyrenean regions,
like Aragon, Navarre or Old Catalonia. The closure of the frontier had led gradually
to attempts to restrict succession to one child by allowing a parent, if he or she so
wished, to give him or her a mejora, an ‘advantage’ out of the fifth of the estate which
might be left freely for masses or legacies, together with a third of the remaining four-
fifths, which traditionally had to be split up equally in legítimas (‘mandatory shares’)
to each boy or girl. In practice, the great majority of Castilians continued to adhere to
the principle of equality, which poses interesting questions about how a social elite
was able to form and to perpetuate itself. As we described in an earlier chapter, the
aristocracy had increasing recourse to the mayorazgo or entail. At a lower social level,
village elites seem to have used capellanías or chantry benefices. Thus, when Doña
Bernarda Chavarría of the Granadan community of Orgiva—a wealthy labradora or
‘peasant’, as she called herself—founded an endowment of fifteen masses every year
for her soul, she set aside a house and fields worth 22,000 reales for this purpose,
specifying that the priest should at each generation be her ‘nearest kinsman’ (1742).
When the priest Miguel Tello drew up his will in 1682, he divided land worth 50,000
reales among his four nephews, but set aside a house and fields worth 19,800 for a
chantry of twenty masses to be said every year for his soul. It was the accumulation
of these small benefices which marked out the rural elites of early modern Spain. 20
The egalitarianism of Castilian inheritance remained, nevertheless, a significant
factor. One safety-valve, of course, was the demography of the period. As Paloma
Fernández Pérez reminds us in her study of the merchants of Cadiz in the eighteenth
century, mortality rates at the time were high and a fifth of the testators in her
sample had no surviving offspring, and another two-fifths had only one or two.
The merchants might also try to offload their surplus children into the ample
bosom of the Catholic Church, as nuns or friars. They would use the mejora in
some cases, often apparently as a kind of advance on the inheritance, for a son
embarking on his first trading voyage to America or on an apprenticeship. And
there were the exhortations—persuasive, even if they may have lacked legal force
—to heirs to leave their portions with the estate for a time, until the business
partners could adjust the accounts and pay each what he or she was owed. 21
The former silk merchant and now municipal councillor (jurado) of Granada,
Don Jerónimo de Aranda Sotomayor, tried to reconcile conflicting claims when
he came to draw up his testament in 1704. He had had ten children, of whom only
three were left alive. His son Luis had received 33,000 reales at his marriage, his
daughter Josefa had got 50,000 at hers; now he was resolved to leave his house
and furniture—but not the stores of raw silk—to his other daughter Angela, who
had come back to live with her parents after the annulment of an unhappy marriage,
looking after her father and mother ‘with great care and love and obedience’. So
she was granted a mejora, which would not need to be specifically valued, ‘given
the union, affection and love which the said Don Luis, Doña Josefa and Doña
198THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Angela bear one another...and the obedience they have always shown me...thanks
to which God has greatly favoured them’. When it came to dividing up the property,
the old man appealed to his son, ‘that he favour his sisters, letting them choose
the best property, the ones easiest to administer or to collect, so that they can get
by, since they are women with no knowledge of the world...’. In return, they
would repay such kindness by leaving Luis or his children as their heirs (Josefa
was widowed, with no children of her own). 22 In fact, the records of litigation in
the chancery court of Granada bear witness to the frequent souring of such relationships—
kept alive, perhaps, during the lifetime of the siblings, but subject to all kinds of
strain and misapprehensions even then and certainly when the next generation
began to assert its claims.
The discussion of inheritance needs to focus more on the ongoing relationship
between the parties, on the possibilities opened up by cooperation or foreclosed
by conflict, rather than on a simple accounting of the material assets available for
distribution at the death of the parents. In the first place, even the peasant farm
was heavily involved with the market, for it needed money to pay its taxes and to
provide for the recurring cycle of domestic festivities associated with birth, marriage
and death. One of our best sources of information here are the memoirs of the
Catalan peasant Sebastià Casanovas (1710–56?). Essentially the owner of this masia
of four or five hectares depended on being able to lease other fields in order to get
by. Leasing, in turn, depended on a host of other factors, principally on one’s
reputation for reliability. Sebastià’s father could get no one to entrust him with
fields on lease unless he brought his own plough animals, but because he was so
heavily in debt already no one would rent him the mules he needed.
The debts of the Casanovas family stemmed from more than one cause, but one
of the most significant factors was commitments to junior family members. Though
under the Pyrenean stem-family system one son would take over the farm, he had
to see to the endowment of his brothers and sisters. Sebastià was bitter against his
paternal grandmother for having used her dowry to give too much away. With one
of his first cousins, who claimed part of the grandmother’s estate, ‘with tears in my
eyes I begged him for pity’s sake not to harm his own flesh and blood in this way’.
But the reality was that the younger children of the Casanovas household generally
married, setting up for themselves in crafts or as leaseholders, and exacting the
maximum legítimas to which the law or the favour of a particular parent entitled
them. In spite of Sebastià’s quarrels with his kin over inheritance, though, he could
not afford to ignore them. The family remained for him a source of inspiration in
spite of all its debts and mismanagement. Though his friends advised him to strike
out on his own and abandon the little homestead, ‘so great was my heart-break at
seeing how the place was going to rack and ruin and that the name of my ancestors
would be lost, that it would make me weep just to think of it’. 23
References have been made several times already to the importance of marriage
and the dowry in the whole strategy of inheritance, and it is time we examined
this aspect more closely. It was noted in Chapter 2 that frontier customs favoured
199THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
the wife’s right to one half of the homestead, which she may often have helped to
found. Though the closure of the frontier led to a reshaping of inheritance law
from the later Middle Ages, women continued to control much property—as heiresses
in their own right, as recipients of dowry from their parents, as claimants on that
dowry when widowed, together with one half of any ‘gains’ (gananciales) made
during the marriage. ‘The common custom of mankind,’ thought the social reformer
López Bravo in 1627, explaining these rights, ‘held it to be absolutely unfair that
women, being more fragile and leisured, and less apt for work and earning a
living, should be left disinherited and poverty-stricken.’ 24
The rise of the dowry in this period in Europe generally has been connected to
the greater emphasis on conservation of the patrimony in the male line, with the
corresponding submission of the woman, as daughter and bride, to an increasingly
patriarchal society. No doubt there was something of this in Spanish developments
too. But one needs to remember that the dowry was part of a system of female
inheritance—inheritance in the form of liquid assets (cash, jewels, furnishings)
which might have to be mobilised through the mortgaging of the patrimony. Inevitably
the dowry reflected an urbanising economy, where money was more abundant
and where it was used to promote the social mobility of families. López Bravo
deplored the fact that many parents, ‘in order to place their daughters with illustrious
and opulent spouses, leave their offspring penniless and disinherited’. And the
Junta of Reform around the same time (1621) declared: ‘It has become so much
the usage in our Spain for parents to give all their property to one daughter in
order to marry her advantageously that they leave the others without any dowry.’ 25
In response to its concern, a law was adopted in 1623 refurbishing earlier restrictions
of 1534 and 1573 on the dowry in proportion to the income of the brides’ parents.
But like the previous measures, it quickly proved to be a dead letter. The Portuguese
writer on the family, Francisco Manuel de Mello, pointed out the terrible moral
cost, in the wreckage of individual lives, of the need for dowries. Girls of good
family but small means were often ‘condemned to lose perforce their freedom and
take an estate in life which they do not desire and must take on sufferance’—that
is, they would have to become nuns. ‘For this ill there is almost no cure, for it
would be necessary first to set the commonwealth as a whole to rights.’ 26
What seems to have happened in many cases was that—because girls were seen
to be ‘unprotected’, as López Bravo and Don Jerónimo de Aranda Sotomayor
claimed—much of the patrimony was actually placed on their head, at least below
the level of the lineage-conscious aristocracy. A daughter of an eighteenth-century
merchant of Cadiz tended to be married when she was twenty or twenty-one
years of age, with her father bringing his new son-in-law into the household for a
few years as a business partner, while ‘exporting’ his own sons into positions
elsewhere. 27 An illustration of this way of life can be found in the memoirs of
Raimundo de Lantery. In 1695 he married off his seventeen- or eighteen-year-old
daughter Clara to José Antonio de Iriberri, a friend of Clara’s brother and a man
of about twenty-three or twenty-four. Although Iriberri had never actually met
200THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Clara, Lantery tells us, ‘having made enquiries about who he was and where he
was from, I agreed to it, because all my friends advised me to make the match’.
The ceremony was a simple one, a semi-private exchange of vows, as allowed by
the church. Iriberri embarked for the Indies in 1696, after the birth of their first
child, carrying ‘knick-knacks’ (niñerías) which his father-in-law gave him to trade
with, ‘with no accounts drawn up, since he was part of the household, and his
wife and child remained at my expense’. When Iriberri returned in 1699, the
marriage was formalised in church through the public blessing and velación of the
couple— the placing of the veil on the head of the woman and shoulders of the
man—which marked at this time the departure of bride and groom into a home of
their own, accompanied by the transfer of dowry. In this case the dowry seems to
have taken the form of a consignment of goods from Lantery to Iriberri, with
which to trade in the Indies. Later that year Iriberri was dead, of yellow fever in
Veracruz. His widow returned, now with two infants, to live with her father, until
the latter found her another protector, his clerk, Don José Ponce de León. After
consulting his confessor, friends, brother and wife, Lantery broached the subject
to Clara: ‘She replied that she had no other desire but to do the will of her father.’
On 11 April 1700, therefore, arrayed in mourning still for her first husband, she
married again. 28
The dowry was often the very foundation of a new family in material terms, a
bedrock of resources on which it could fall back in hard times. The Cortes of
sixteenth-century Castile voiced their concern that married women controlled so
many assets, yet were regarded as judicial minors. Thus, they were frequently
asked to sign contracts alongside their husband, but if the deal turned out badly,
it would be assumed by an investigating magistrate that their signature was invalid,
extorted by force or deceit. 29 Women were entitled to gananciales—one half of the
assets of the household ‘acquired’ during the marriage—over and above the return
of their dowry, when their husband died. Merchants were sometimes concerned
to get their wives to commute this by the terms of the marriage contract to a
legacy, in order to prevent the inevitable break-up of the business at their death
should the widow insist on her full claims. 30 Of course, while the husband was
alive, it was he who actually administered his wife’s estate, though even here
Manuel de Mello refers to the recent growth (1651) of the custom among aristocrats
of specifying an annuity for the wife—her ‘pin money’ or alfileres —which was under
her entire control.
Marriage negotiations played a vital role, therefore, in ensuring the future success
of a family, and involved an elaborate mobilisation of the energies and resources
of the clan as a whole. When Esteban de Garibay, Basque gentleman and chronicler,
lost his first wife around 1574, a nun of Toledo began to find him a replacement—
her fifteen-year-old sister, Doña Luisa de Montoya. She acted thus, Garibay tells
us, ‘because not only did she and her relatives know me from my youth, but her
parents and mine had had dealings for a very long period of over forty years’.
Garibay was hesitant: to marry a girl from Toledo would tie him down there and
201THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
prevent him returning to the Basque Country. But after long consultations with
friars and friends, he agreed with her brother and uncle to conclude the match—
on condition of a large dowry, which involved the brother sacrificing some of his
own claims on his parental inheritance. The same day Garibay sat down to write
his first letter to his new bride, ‘congratulating her on a union which is to the
service of God and our own repose’. 31
Essentially the conduct of marriage negotiations was a delicate business, involving
as it did the weighing up on each side of a variety of factors: geographical location
of the family, wealth, honour, influence exerted by intermediaries. A vivid insight
into the whole process is provided by the letters of the Manso de Velasco family
(1752–4), a noble family from the Rioja region. One of its members had become
viceroy of Peru and count of Superunda, thanks in part to the patronage of his
fellow Riojan, the famous marquis of Ensenada, chief minister of Spain between
1743 and 1754. Superunda’s nephew, Don Félix José Manso, began to contemplate
a second marriage in 1752 in order to procure a male heir. We find him contacting
a canon of nearby Burgos to find out ‘if in Burgos there is anything suitable,
assuming that the lady would be of quality and bearing, and that she would have
some property’. But his enthusiasm seems to have cooled when the worthy priest
replied that in old Burgos ‘you will only find much honour, but nothing in the
way of material assets’. Another intermediary, Canon Mortela of Calahorra close
by, who had stood as godfather to Don Félix’s younger brother, now took a hand,
promising to use his contacts in Madrid and Zaragoza. He asked Félix to give him
a list of his rents so that he could show it to the father of one possible candidate,
but he warned that the girl herself might not be appealing: ‘They tell me that
even if she got the whole of Viana as her portion, she would not get a husband,
since she is so ugly and sickly and so very blear-eyed.’ Anyway, Don Félix, with
daughters of his own, must realise that it would be hard to find a woman prepared
to take on the responsibility of rearing them, nor was the canon sure that many
women would want to leave their homes in Madrid or Zaragoza for the isolation
of La Rioja. 32
Rather than a simple transfer of dowry and a bride, therefore, marriage involved
the mobilisation of a network of intermediaries and reinforced the clan structure
of Spanish society. Given that so much property was pledged to and with women,
their alliances were critical to the re-establishment of family status at each new
generation. When Don Félix Manso’s younger brother Diego came to marry, he
had set his sights on an heiress, the marquesa of Bermudo, of Ciudad Rodrigo,
then aged seventeen or eighteen. Once again intermediaries were called upon,
with the clergy utilising their particularly well-established networks of information.
The eight months of discussion had to be conducted discreetly, with the bride’s
father reluctant to meet Don Diego openly, for that would send out a public signal
of his commitment to the marriage. Instead, he wanted to be sure that this cadet
of a minor Riojan house was a suitable match for his daughter. The youth was
presently gazetted as a naval captain: would his patron Ensenada ensure his promotion?
202THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Alternatively, would he be allowed to retire from the service (the young marquesa
seems to have begged for this, reluctant to be left alone at home)? Above all,
would the boy’s uncle, the count of Superunda, viceroy of Peru, guarantee the
boy’s future by buying land immediately for him? The negotiations stalled when
Ensenada fell from power in 1754; but his successor at the War Office, Don Sebastián
Eslava, was beholden to Superunda for finding husbands for two of his nieces in
Peru and tried to help out. 33
In general, it would seem that marriage was arranged where possible within a
known circle of friends, given that it would effectively commit two family networks
to a continuing interaction and cooperation over time. The essayist Francisco Manuel
de Mello commented on the delicacy of relations with the parents, brothers and
sisters of the spouse: ‘so great is the love we owe to such near kin that, because it
can never be paid, it may turn to loathing’. 34 Would there be a tendency, therefore,
to restrict the range of marriage partners to the group of those related anyway by
blood? The Spanish government became concerned in the Age of the Enlightenment
with the amount of money flowing out to Rome in order to purchase dispensations
from the so-called prohibited degrees of kinship— descendants of a common great-
great-grandfather, whom canon law barred from marrying one another. In response
to enquiries from the Council of Castile in 1783, one bishop noted that such close
unions were particularly frequent in the smaller villages of his diocese: ‘the women
of a particular pueblo usually practise just one handicraft or skill from the time
they are girls...and this means that outsiders are not useful in the community’.
The Bishop of Almería reported that there were some 200 marriages a year within
the prohibited degrees in his diocese of 95,204 people, and thought it must have
something to do with the Reconquest, when Christian settlers had shunned contact
with those of suspect ancestry, a phenomenon aggravated by ‘the rivalry which
usually exists between one village and its neighbour’. 35
The government estimated in 1762 that there were between 10,000 and 11,000
dispensations issued for Spain as a whole every year—roughly equivalent to one
marriage in nine. The phenomenon seems to have been particularly marked among
certain sections of the elite—one in four marriages among the oligarchy of Cartagena,
for example, between 1750 and 1850—and in villages. 36 The investigations which
preceded the issue of dispensations are stored in the episcopal archives—quite substantial
documents, which are impressive testimony in their own way to the sense of genealogical
memory kept alive in peasant communities. But they are a difficult source to exploit,
at least on their own, for the alleged need for the dispensation had to fit one of
the ‘good causes’ recognised by canon law: that the village was too small or the
girl’s family too poor for her to find a suitable partner of the same honourable
standing, or alternatively (if the relationship was that of first cousin) that she had
been ‘dishonoured’ by her fiancé’s too frequent visits to the house, especially at
dusk. In some cases it is evident that there were strategic property considerations
at stake—especially when an heiress was married off to a paternal kinsman in
order to keep alive the name of the family. But more often the dispensations seem
203THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
to reflect merely the tight circle of friendships within which the family moved,
reflecting its choice of a bride who would consolidate existing links of neighbourhood.
They symbolise a certain tension between ecclesiastical and secular views of the
purpose of marriage, typical of western Christendom generally since the central
Middle Ages. The emphasis of the church on the individual and its concerns about
the exclusive loyalties associated with the kin group find an echo in Spanish literature.
Echoing Saint Augustine, the sixteenth-century Dominican theologian Pedro de
Ledesma justified the church’s basic reluctance to see cousins marry each other:
‘The reason is in order for amity to be extended and propagated to more people’—
to foster social harmony and avoid the old perils of the kin feud. 37
‘The intrinsic aim of marriage,’ wrote the Franciscan moralist Antonio Arbiol
in his treatise of 1715, ‘is the conjoining of souls.’ Echoing other theologians, he
stressed the sacred nature of the union between a man and a woman, an unbreakable
bond whose prime purpose was to strengthen each on the path to eternal life. ‘No
one after God must a woman love or esteem more than her husband, nor a husband
more than his wife.’ 38 Even the good Don Quixote noted that one would want to
choose a companion carefully before embarking on a long journey: ‘So, why should
one not do the same for a journey which will last a lifetime, down to the abode of
death, especially if the companion will be with us in bed, at the table and everywhere,
as a wife will be with her husband.’ 39 There was a risk of conflict here, between
the emotional and spiritual needs of the individual man and woman, safeguarded
in the main by the church, and the strategic interests of the family as a whole.
The risk might be minimised, of course, by the rather strict seclusion of women
in Mediterranean countries, so that—as Clara Lantery told her father—the young
people had ‘no other will’ but that of their parents. Fray Miquel Agustín, in his
influential handbook of 1617 for the running of the Catalan peasant household,
devoted a lengthy section to the role of the unmarried daughters. They should
stay upstairs, out of the way of the labourers, except at meal times or when invited
down by their elders. They should always keep their feet covered with shoes and
stockings, and fix their eyes on the ground. ‘Whenever they go out of the house,
they will stay close beside their mother...They will wear their shawl a little down
over their face...’ In church, they would take care to avoid the glances of men,
especially as attention wandered during the sermon. A century later, Antonio Arbiol
was warning about the dangers of the velada, the gathering of neighbours ‘in the
long nights of winter’, when boys and girls often met in one another’s houses. 40
He wanted girls to avoid ‘plays, strolls, visits and card games’, which occupied
the time of their ‘empty-headed’ sisters.
Such ideals took little account of the reality of life for many women. These
figure largely in the chronicles of Spanish cities of the Golden Age as market
vendors and bakers and servants in inns—a wide variety of trades where they
were constantly in touch with the public. In 1548 Pedro de Medina noticed the
contrast as he moved north from his native Andalusia into the Old Christian
lands of Castile, that the women got ‘tougher’ (recias). In some parts they worked
204THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
in the fields, reaping grain (at most Andalusian women would pick olives) and
travelling to market to sell their produce. In the market square of Bilbao, he
remarked that one would usually find over one hundred maidens selling food,
‘all of them bare-headed...and their heads close-shaven’, until they found a husband,
when they would adopt the coif, which everywhere marked out the married
woman. 41 Campomanes in 1775 also remarked on this contrast between the ‘idle’
women of Andalusia and their active sisters further north. The elite were, indeed,
more sheltered everywhere, but literature and litigation offer much insight into
how contacts were actually made between the sexes at this level. In one of her
short stories, María de Zayas (1590–1661?) describes the meeting of the sixteen-
year-old Jacinta with the twenty-four-year-old Félix, just returned from the wars
in Flanders to his home town of Baeza. She visited him in the company of her
friend, Félix’s sister, ‘in which visit Don Félix let me know by his eyes and his
words the love he bore me’. She reciprocated: ‘I encouraged him as he walked
up and down my street by day and night, strumming a guitar’, and they met, as
Andalusian couples traditionally did, at the reja, the downstairs window with its
grille, while the family slept above. 42 The records of the diocesan courts of Andalusia,
called upon to arbitrate in these cases of love which crossed family interest,
often contain precious letters from this period. ‘The sun would have first to fail
before I give him up’, ‘I shall not give him up, though they tear me into a thousand
pieces’: the language of all classes is wildly romantic, no doubt doctored by
professional scribes, but cautioning the historian against neglect of the personal
element in traditional marriages.
The thirteenth-century Castilian law code, the Siete Partidas, had stated quite
clearly that ‘parents may not marry off their children unless they are present or
give their consent’, though warning against love matches made by young people,
‘from which sometimes arise very great feuds, and the death of men and bloodshed’.
But the frontier situation seems to have favoured elopement, with local customs
allowing fugitives to defy the wrath of their kin and establish themselves in the
new communities founded during the Reconquest. 43 Above all, canon law, developing
in effectiveness from the twelfth century everywhere in Western Europe, began to
apply the basic idea of the church that marriage was a sacrament, a means of
salvation for two souls, in which considerations of kinship or property should not
intervene. Thus, the bishop or his vicar general would receive petitions from youths
claiming that the parents of his beloved were impeding the course of true love,
and by the mechanism of the saca (the ‘taking out’) a royal constable would be
instructed to remove the girl and ‘explore her wishes’ regarding matrimony. Since
marriage itself was made, in the eyes of the church, by the exchange of vows
between two individuals, it was sometimes assumed that a ‘promise to marry in
the future’ (palabra de futuro) was equivalent to the marriage vow itself (palabra de
presente). The informality of the wedding ceremony in Spain—as more generally in
Mediterranean lands—has to be borne in mind. It was conducted in many cases in
the house of the bride, with the procession to church for the solemn blessing
205THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
(velación or veiling), only taking place when the dowry was handed over and the
bride was ready to leave the parental home—perhaps months or years after the
wedding itself.
Sometimes the betrothal itself was allowed to drag on in much the same way.
Thus the Jesuit missionary Pedro de León observed in parts of the mountainous
regions of Granada in the later sixteenth century the behaviour of the Christian
settlers who had supplanted the Moriscos. They would stay ‘two, three, four and
more years betrothed without getting married, and they were burdened with children
and in a state of mortal sin’. 44 By the suit known as demanda de palabra a girl could
‘demand’ enforcement of a promise of marriage. The jurisprudence of the Spanish
diocesan courts—perhaps with an eye on the risk of feud rather than on the strict
letter of canon law—would allow circumstantial evidence (typically that the boy
and girl had been seen together too much in each other’s company) to establish
the case, whereupon a constable would swing into action again, gaoling the young
man until he consented to go through with the marriage.
In these cases much depended on the initiative of the parties themselves; one
finds little enough of the attempt to regulate morality from above, typical of the
Puritan Reformation in northern Europe. There were, indeed, traditional sanctions
against sexual relationships which upset the social order. Thus the Valencian guilds,
like their counterparts in Germany, adopted measures in this regard, which were
designed to protect the integrity of a home which was also the place of work.
Thus the shoemakers in 1421 resolved to expel masters who had concubines,
while the woollen weavers more modestly excluded such from guild office in 1472. 45
Such measures were directed fundamentally against married men: so the jurats of
Valencia decreed in 1446 that the yellow hood, which marked the shame of concubines,
would not be applied if both parties were free to marry.
Such laxity came under threat at the time of the Counter-Reformation. The
Council of Trent specifically enjoined bishops to enquire into public sin, expelling
from the community any woman living in concubinage who had ignored three
warnings. But attempts to apply these regulations were not notably successful.
The cathedral chapter of Granada protested that the Tridentine ruling would cause
‘very great inconveniences’ by publishing liaisons best left discreet; and the Cortes
of Valencia pointed out in 1626 that the shaming of a married woman in this way
would inflict ‘infamy’ on her husband, sons and relatives, ‘broadcasting with these
demonstrations what was not known, and giving rise to a lot of vendettas and
killings’. Castillo de Bobadilla thought that there needed to be grave public scandal
if the corregidor was to act in support of the bishop in these cases, and that the
unmarried, where there was no adultery involved, should be warned but rarely
prosecuted. 46 In practice, the pursuit of public sin seems to have proceeded by fits
and starts. Archbishop Ribera, as viceroy of Valencia between 1602 and 1604,
displayed a keenness, as one might expect of the man, to round up concubines,
giving them a warning for the first offence, then a public admonition, and finally
gaol (even for nobles). Fray Antonio de Tapia, low-born and zealous bishop of
206THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Cordoba from 1649, began a similar drive there. The Inquisition for its part began
to take an increasing interest in Castile from the middle of the sixteenth century
in fornication, though in a curiously indirect way, as befitted a tribunal which
was supposed to limit itself to heresy. Thus, it could not punish men for illicit
sexual relations, but it would whip and shame them for boasting that it was no
grave sin to lie with an unmarried woman if she consented. 47
It had been a feature of late medieval reform to deal with marginal groups by
separating them from the body politic and placing them in their own ghetto, subject
to close surveillance. Thus from the middle of the fourteenth century the ‘loose
woman’ tended to be herded into one of those official brothels whose size and
policing attracted the attention of foreign travellers in Renaissance Spain. That of
Valencia consisted around 1500 of three or four streets, walled off from the rest of
the city, with taverns and rooms for 200–300 women. It was in terms of ‘moral
hygiene’ that these institutions were defended, even by some of the clergy, like
the Valencian priest and historian Escolano. Thus no girls were allowed in except
of their own free will—the justices were to interrogate them about this every month
according to the Cordoban regulations of 1545, for example, which also ensured
that they paid a fixed tariff for food and lodging in order to avoid their falling
into the clutches of pimps. There were also fixed tariffs for customers, who must
be unmarried men. 48
This ‘ghettoisation’ of the marginal was already breaking down in respect of
Moors and Jews, as we shall see in the next chapter, and it was probably inevitable
that the moral reprobates would also be reintegrated into the wider society by an
increasingly evangelical church. Various regulations provided that the inmates of
these mancebías (brothels) attend mass once a week, that they be offered dowries at
municipal expense in order to marry, and that they attend sermons in Holy Week
in order to persuade them to repent. Concern about venereal disease also played
a role, with monthly visits by surgeons prescribed by several towns, extended to
weekly inspections in all of them by the terms of a royal decree of 1571. A home
for ex-prostitutes who could be persuaded to leave the brothel, was set up in
Valencia in 1600, with a subsidy from the city hall, and even Escolano, despite
his defence of the mancebía itself, thought the new foundation was pleasing to God
and had helped avert the plague of that year from his native city. In Madrid a
‘house of correction’ was set up for fallen women in 1608—‘where they gather
girls who don’t want to go into service and who are living in sin’, as the chronicler
Cabrera de Córdova put it. With heads shaved and clothed in sackcloth, the inmates
were set to spin and meditate in silence on the error of their ways. 49 It was only a
matter of time before the government bowed to pressure for moral reform and
closed down the municipal brothels throughout Spain (1623).
A major part of this new policy of rigour must be attributed to the Jesuits,
founded in 1540 to bring the word of God to the laity, and some of the most
active preachers in the brothels, prisons and remote villages of Spain. But their
campaign also had its limits. Pedro de León, whom we have come across before,
207THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
has left a precious record of how the evangelist had to take account of the susceptibilities
of lay society. When he went to preach a Lenten mission in Cazorla in 1589, he
found a nobleman there who had been living with his mistress for twenty-four
years past, ‘and he had many children by her’. Father León eventually persuaded
the gentleman to marry, but only on condition the marriage was kept secret for
his kinsmen would oppose it. In spite of the recent regulations of the Council of
Trent (1563) that the banns must be published on three successive holy days before
the assembled congregation in the parish church, León and the governor’s wife
got the local parish priest to conduct the ceremony on the spot, without telling
anyone, promising to have the bishop ratify it afterwards. In September 1590
Father León had a similar success in another part of Andalusia, getting a nobleman
to marry his Moorish slave by whom he had offspring. 50
The Council of Trent refused to go along with Protestant reformers and strengthen
parental control over marriage. At most, it consented to abolish clandestine marriages—
that is, insisting on the presence of a priest and two witnesses at an exchange of
vows, and publishing the banns beforehand, unless the bishop saw fit to dispense
with these for good cause. But on the main issues—the absolute freedom of the
bride and groom, the binding nature of the promise to marry—the Catholic Church
refused to budge. The Cortes of Castile voiced their particular concern with the
betrothal, still often clandestine even if the marriage itself was not. ‘Many honourable
girls of good family are taken in by promises of marriage which are made to them
and many youngsters married off to persons of lower rank, to the dishonour of
their parents and lineages, because of the binding nature of these promises, which,
being only young, they give lightly to each other.’ 51 Though Philip II repeatedly
promised to write to the pope on the matter, nothing was actually done.
Spanish theologians made an important contribution to the development of
canon law, notably the Cordoban Jesuit Tomás Sánchez, whose great work of
1592 on marriage ran through many editions in Catholic Europe down to the
eighteenth century. To some extent these men seem to be reflecting the constraints
of their own society—that is, the honour-conscious Spanish lineage. But mostly
their work was clearly guided by their perception of the ‘natural law’, as expressed
in the wisdom of the Roman legislators and the tradition of the church. So Sánchez
praised the freedom of the individual to make his or her own choice of partner,
while upholding the need of the state to guarantee social order. Children, on pain
of mortal sin, should bear in mind the common good, thus accepting a match if it
would help to reconcile warring kin groups. The supreme rule was caritas, that
‘good fellowship’ which led the church also to set its face in principle against
marriage within an existing kin group. On the question of sanctions against a
disobedient child, though, Sánchez was less clear. The Castilian law of 1505 had
only allowed disinheritance in the case of a marriage which was ‘clandestine’; but
it was not clear what, if anything, could be done about children who used the
lawful instruments of the saca and the demanda to thwart parental wishes. There
was always the possibility of leaving the child without a dowry, and with the legal
208THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
minimum—legítima—when one came to die (and in the Crown of Aragon the legítima
was often pretty small). But the Dominican theologian Pedro de Ledesma cautioned
fathers and mothers against nourishing anger in their hearts against wayward
offspring: ‘Confessors and learned men must advise parents not to use the full
rigour of the law...unless there has been very great disrespect shown to them.’ 52
‘The church has left no one in any doubt how displeasing to God parental
oppression can be,’ commented a later Jesuit writer, Matías Sánchez (1740), adding
that these were often bad judges of what constituted a dishonourable match, ‘because
they get so angry’. Luther and Calvin, with their horror of celibacy and exaltation
of the married state, ‘favour excessively the jurisdiction and authority of the parent’.
But, if the diocesan courts decided there was good cause, children could not be
disinherited for following their own inclinations and even marrying ‘a person of
lower condition’ —though they would often ‘sin very gravely’ in upsetting their
families in this way. ‘The whole difficulty,’ concluded the worthy Jesuit, ‘is to
maintain a balance.’ 53
How are we to understand the long duration of this apparent conflict between
moral principle and family interest? One of the few lay writers on the subject,
Francisco Manuel de Mello, recognised that ‘unsatisfactory marriages, which upset
parents’ were frequent enough in his own day (1651). But most of these cases, he
thought, involved errors of judgement and wounded pride, ‘few of them, real
pain’. 54 As one studies the records of the diocesan courts, one is struck by a certain
ambiguity surrounding the whole notion of mésalliance in a society, where the kin
group was such an open, rambling network of members occupying very different
social and economic positions. Respectable ancestry and the opportunity of patronage
could be offset against lack of wealth.
An illustration of this comes with the ‘unequal marriage’ in Granada in 1542
between Leonor, grand-daughter of the secretary of the Catholic Kings, Hernando
de Zafra, as well as grand-niece on her mother’s side of the chief minister of Charles
V, Francisco de los Cobos. Leonor was sixteen when she began to be courted by
her brother’s friend, Diego de Pisa, younger son of a Granadan judge. As the eldest
daughter, Leonor was reserved by her parents for a match with ‘some titled gentleman
of these realms’, using Uncle Francisco’s great influence, and certainly not for a
penniless younger son like Diego. The trouble was that Diego had a powerful patron,
the marquis of Mondéjar, who held court in the Alhambra as captain general of
Granada, and who pressed the suit on Los Cobos. Leonor’s mother (who, as one of
the powerful clan of Los Cobos, did the talking in place of her husband) was suitably
evasive. But time was not on her side, as the young lovers began to exchange letters
through the servants and arrange trysts. Diego wrote to Leonor, in one of those
touching letters which still lie, oddly out of place, in the legal archives, that if they
were caught out, she was not to worry: ‘These storms usually last for a week or so.’
In the event, they were surprised together, along with their incriminating correspondence,
which led the distraught mother, after consultation with Uncle Francisco, to save
what could be saved of the family honour by having Diego wed Leonor in a simple,
209THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
lonely ceremony. She ordered all the doors and windows of the house locked, recalled
one witness, ‘so that none of the servants could look out to see what was going on’.
Friends arranged a reconciliation within a year. But it was a fragile peace, which
broke down when Francisco de los Cobos died in 1547 and Diego sued for a dowry,
since he had not got the promotion he was hoping for from a relationship with this
politically powerful family. 55
In this case the canon law, by upholding the concept of the freedom of individuals
to marry, served as a kind of lightning-conductor. When Leonor’s brother challenged
Diego in the street—telling him that ‘he had behaved very badly in being his friend
and hatching betrayal in his house, whereupon the two reached for their swords
and lunged at each other’ —trouble was ultimately averted by the moral authority
of the church in these disputes over matrimony. Equally, of course, there might
be occasions when the canon law would prove counterproductive. One such incident
concerned Don Fadrique de Toledo, eldest son and heir of the great duke of Alba.
In 1567, as a callow youth, he made a promise of marriage to Doña Magdalena de
Guzmán, daughter of a royal judge and a lady-in-waiting at court. When Alba
arranged for the young man to marry a cousin instead in 1578, Doña Magdalena
appealed to the king. Philip I I referred the case to a special junta, giving his own
opinion that Fadrique was obliged to respect his promise, ‘both in conscience and
as a gentleman’. But he did not hold out much hope that a demanda de palabra suit
before the diocesan court would give much satisfaction—‘because of the delays
there will be, with appeals to Rome and other circumstances that usually arise in
these cases, so that not only will her youth be spent but her life will be over’.
Pressure brought to bear on Alba, currently out of favour at court anyway, had to
be dropped at the beginning of 1580 when he was needed to lead the army for the
invasion of Portugal that year. Magdalena made a last appeal to the king: ‘I shall
strive all my life to uphold my honour and the truth of my case.’ But she found it
prudent in the end to drop her suit—in return for a handsome dowry to marry a
descendant of the conqueror of Mexico, Hernán Cortés. 56
In practice, therefore, the letter of canon law seems to have been adapted to
take account of social reality. Litigation over betrothals or promises of marriage
depended generally on circumstantial evidence, leaving considerable leeway for
the diocesan court to make up its own mind. As one canon lawyer put it in 1594,
a man who seduced a woman of notably lower class than himself could be presumed
not to have given her a valid—that is, an intentional—commitment to marry her.
Yet the letter of the law remained, inviting exploitation at unscrupulous hands.
This was what worried Joaquín Amorós, whose lengthy treatise of 1777 was devoted
to explaining why the law had to be reformed. ‘Any woman can come forward
with a suit to the vicar general,’ he wrote, ‘presenting a summary statement from
witnesses, most of them of doubtful character’, alleging betrothal to someone.
The poor fellow would ‘generally’ be arrested and detained until he agreed to
marry. The suits of demanda and saca had been sprouting ‘like weeds’ in the diocesan
courts in recent years. 57
210THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
The language was fairly similar in the preamble to the great government decree
of 1776, which marked one of the several attacks on the power of the church then
being mounted by the Enlightened statesmen of Spain. ‘So frequent has the abuse
of children entering into unequal marriages become,’ thundered the edict, that all
men and women under twenty-five must obtain the consent of their parents to
marry. The law was tightened in 1803, and another measure of 1796 exempted
those facing a betrothal suit from being gaoled. 58 It is possible that the old system
was becoming disfunctional as social mores changed during the eighteenth century,
given the greater informality in the paseos (promenades), now gracing many a
Spanish town, and in the evening gatherings (tertulias), where men and women
would meet. Joaquín Amorós thought the social hierarchy itself was imperilled by
excessive upward mobility of families in this new age of enterprise, and he pointed
to the danger of money undermining respect for lineage. But there was also a
concern with the lower classes, now more prone to marry improvidently as more
employment became available and the economy expanded. The journeyman fails
to consult his father or employer before setting up a home, lamented the count of
Campomanes, later president of the Council of Castile. ‘He is saddled with offspring
before he has a shop of his own or has passed his master’s examination, and his
family is a wretched affair, lacking education or discipline.’ 59
The emphasis on the household as a form of education was an old enough
concept, but one which took on increasing importance in the early modern period.
Whereas ‘politics’ was the art of citizenship, wrote the Augustinian theologian
Camos in 1592, the ‘economy’ reposed on the oikos, the management of the household,
where the elderly were taken care of and the young reared for responsibilities in
the outside world. The union of man and woman, therefore, was a cornerstone of
the social order—‘the most important and the most perfect union that there can be
among human beings’. 60 What kind of household pre-dominated, therefore, in
Spain? The censuses tend to suggest that, as in the rest of Western Europe, it was
mostly nuclear, with the father and mother and their children, excluding other
relatives. The church, interestingly enough, seems to have favoured this model—
possibly on the basis of the experience of its confessors with personal unhappiness
in more extended units. Writing in Aragon in 1715, where the temptation to keep
the family together for economic reasons was very strong, the theologian Arbiol
commented: ‘A loaf of bread in peace and quiet is better than wealth and ease
when you are always upset and quarrelling.’ 61
But if families did tend to live apart, they cooperated very closely, and often
one needs to get beyond the censuses in order to perceive this underlying reality.
The domestic architecture of Andalusian villages, for example, reflects an age-old
pattern of division of the parental dwelling between two or more siblings, whose
own offspring may still be neighbours. Party walls are run up and torn down,
new doors opened into the patio or street, windows blocked off, according to the
needs of each generation. Though the space available would clearly vary with the
economic situation of the owner, there may have been a certain lack of privacy in
211THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Spanish houses. Joly observed, for example, that even in the bigger ones one
passed directly from the common living room (sala) to the bedrooms (the suitably
named alcobas, or alcoves) —‘though you don’t go into them unless you want to
sleep, for they are dark and lack chimneys or any window, and they have no
wardrobe or cabinet’. 62 Much remains to be studied about the distribution of domestic
space, but we have one interesting description from the pen of the merchant Lantery
of the house he leased in 1680 in Cadiz (admittedly a town where building land
was always peculiarly scarce). His family in these years seems to have consisted
of himself, his wife and four young children, together with his brother and nephew
(who helped in the business), three black slaves (a mother and her two daughters),
and two old ladies, one a godmother of the children and another ‘whom I took in
out of charity’. Given that the house was built around its inner patio, with no
windows on to the street, this female company seems to have played a key role in
the life of Lantery’s wife. The brother and nephew may have lodged in the company
offices on the ground floor, and the slaves (who refused to leave Cadiz when
Lantery sent his family back to Savoy in 1685 and had to be sold off ) may have
had rooms in the kitchen area. Otherwise, the domestic space, though large, hardly
provided much intimacy, with its ‘dining room’, off which led one alcoba, and its
living room, off which led another. Lantery would, no doubt, receive male company
in his ‘office’ (despacho) at the head of the stairs, while his wife entertained her
female friends on the estrado, the typical platform with its cushions on which Spanish
women squatted in one corner of the sala, leaving men to sit on chairs elsewhere. 63
Though the women of a respectable household were, in this way, sheltered from
the street, they had frequent communication with the outside world through the
ubiquitous criado—‘reared one’, or servant. The Spanish word (used also of a foster-
child at the time) reflects an inherent ambiguity about the status of this personage—
who sometimes turns out to be an illegitimate son or daughter of the household
head in the litigation over inheritance. Diego de Torres Villarroel, author of a classic
autobiography (1743), recounted how his great-grandfather, a penniless immigrant,
started up in business in Salamanca. Taken in by a phar-macist, he was set to ‘draw
water from the well, wash the pots, grind roots in the mortar, and now and again
rock the cradle’, until, when his master died, he took over the shop and married the
widow, ‘as was the custom’. 64 Joly noted that Spaniards had many servants, but
they were not necessarily to be found within the household itself. Rather, half-a-
dozen youths would turn up at their master’s door in the morning, ready ‘to accompany
him about town until the midday meal’. The lines of communication between the
house and the neighbourhood were, thus, multiple and strong. In Ecija in 1612 one
man was objected to as a witness in a court case involving Don Fernando de Aguilar,
because ‘he had dealings with a black woman who nursed some of Don Fernando’s
children...and he is in the service of a kinsman of the said Don Fernando, for which
reason he has regular entry into Don Fernando’s house’. 65
The Jesuit Gaspar Astete was aware of the difficulty, especially for a woman on
her own, of running such an establishment. Nevertheless, he believed that the widow
212THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
should strive to be ‘a masterful woman’ and (foreshadowing Bernarda Alba) keep
order in her own household, though she might have to call upon the authority of her
kinsmen. 66 In general, the running of a home was regarded as a partnership between
the husband and wife, the one attending to the outside world and the other to domestic
affairs. Lucinda, daughter of wealthy Andalusian peasants, described her day to Don
Quixote: ‘I saw to the dispatch of the servants; the accounts of what was sown and
harvested passed through my hands...’ And Fray Miquel Agustín’s Catalan housewife
was to look after the poultry and dairy products and vegetable garden, as well as
baking and carding wool. She would be first up in the morning and last to go to bed.
She would not, however, handle money, but ‘at night-time she would give her husband
an account of anything new affecting the running of the property that day’. 67
From this economic role there was fashioned an ideal portrait of the mutual
trust and harmony which should reign between the two administrators of the
patrimony. ‘The argument and opinion of the discreet wife carry more weight
than any other in a man’s ears,’ thought Fray Luis de León; the ‘love and friendship’
between both constitute the ‘closest tie’ of all. This may have been rather idealistic,
given the age gap often found between spouses: a good six years in the case of the
eighteenth-century Cadiz merchants, with the husband as much as sixteen years
older in a quarter of cases surveyed later in the century. 68 Nevertheless, Manuel
de Mello stressed the emotional bonding which must develop if the arranged marriage
was to work: affection, if not ‘passion’ would develop as the perceptive husband
noticed that his wife was probably better at ‘taking things in’ (perceber) and ‘thinking
them through’ (discorrer). Criticising Don Francisco Manrique in 1527 for neglecting
his wife, the humanist Antonio de Guevara defined sharply the Renaissance ideal:
that when a man married, he must show his maturity by abandoning the pastimes
of youth, for ‘the man who pays no heed to his wife merits that others pay no
heed to him in turn’. 69
Spanish art, it is true, seems to have been slower than that of northern Europe
in portraying the intimacy of family life. The well-known portraits by Velázquez
of Diego del Corral, Councillor of Castile, and his wife Antonia de Ipeñarrieta
with their son Luis—like many of the altarpieces of the period—tend to reflect
dynastic continuity rather than domesticity. Antonia was a widow anyway, and it
is possible that Diego’s features were painted over those of her husband after her
remarriage in 1627. It is, rather, in the religious art that one tends to find the
moral exemplar of the home—in the ‘Holy Family with the Sleeping Child’ and
‘Holy Family in the Carpenter’s Workshop’ by the Valencian Jerónimo Jacinto
Espinosa (1600– 67), and in similar canvases by Murillo (1617–82). Saint Joseph
had been becoming a prominent figure in Christian devotion in Renaissance Europe
generally, but in Spain his depiction as a relatively youthful father for the boy
Jesus seems to have been precocious. 70
The fundamental aim of this moralisation of the family was to ensure that the
young were raised as proper Christians and citizens. Good upbringing, commented
the theologian Camos in 1592, is more important than good laws, ‘for if men were
213THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
properly trained when they were children and youths, there would be fewer offences
to punish through the courts when they grow up’. It was a point echoed later in the
Enlightenment by the statesman Campomanes: ‘The way to make people behave is
to instil in them virtuous customs...from their childhood, at home, at school and as
apprentices.’ 71 Though the church was keen to foster this approach, there was perhaps
a certain ambivalence about its teaching on a fundamental problem: the number of
the offspring. A couple should think carefully before having more children than
they could care for, suggested Tomás Sánchez in 1592. But, addressing the question
more directly, his fellow Jesuit Matías Sánchez noted in 1740 that the only lawful
way for a Christian to achieve this end was to abstain from sexual intercourse. It
would be less sinful to abandon an unwanted child in a foundling home than to
interfere with pregnancy—which by the eighteenth century seems to have been becoming
a feature of life in Spain as elsewhere in Europe. In a veiled allusion to contraception,
the Franciscan Antonio Arbiol lamented that couples ‘lack a proper idea of Divine
Providence, in whose hands it must be left to feed every creature’. 72
There was not, in fact, a large number of children in the average family,
given the interruption of marriage by death and high infant mortality. Thus, in
one parish in seventeenth-century Medina del Campo, despite a consistently
high birth rate, 40 per cent of the households had no children living with them,
and 25 per cent had only one. The great census of 1787 indicates that just over
a half of the Spanish population was under twenty-five years of age, and over a
third under sixteen. As we suggested in Chapter 2 when looking at demography,
many of these were the products of broken homes—some illegitimate, especially
in the towns, many more orphans. Something like a fifth of marriages in seventeenth-
century Spain were remarriages for one or both partners, and many homes contained
stepchildren. 73
One of the most significant problems facing ecclesiastical reformers as they
sought to found a more ‘godly’ household was the existence of so many illegitimate
offspring. The Venetian ambassador Morosini commented in 1581 that the illegitimate
child enjoyed a higher status in Spain than in other countries. The third duke of
Alcalá brought one bastard, Fernando, with him on official missions, from which
the young man rose to the Council of War, while another, Pelayo, went on to
become archbishop and viceroy of Mexico in 1673. 74 An earlier generation of the
same family had produced one of the outstanding figures of the Counter-Reformation,
Juan de Ribera (1532–1611), illegitimate son of the first duke of Alcalá—and, as
we have seen, a hammer of moral delinquents as archbishop of Valencia. Though
the inheritance rights of the illegitimate were constricted, they crop up in the
chancery courts in cases where a direct line of succession has come to an end,
claiming entails in preference to collateral kin. At least 65 of the 600 or so noble
families in the kingdom of Valencia asked the king for legitimation of offspring
for purposes of inheritance in the Cortes of 1626.
It would seem, nevertheless, that the status and expectations of the illegitimate
were gradually in decline over the early modern period. Manuel de Mello noted
214THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
in his treatise of 1651 that they would have to be reared away from home if a
man’s legitimate spouse objected to their presence, though he urged that they
never be neglected. Many would fall into poverty, saddled with a proud name but
few resources: ‘The Indies and the church usually furnish a good welcome to this
kind of person.’ 75 Among the ordinary people illegitimate children could expect
even less succour, because of the lack of resources. Concerned to check the prejudice
against them, writers of the Enlightenment sometimes painted tragic pictures of
their plight. Thus Cabarrús described the unmarried peasant mother around 1792,
driven out of her village by ‘the thoughtless rigour of my family and of those who
knew me’, unable to find a job as a maid in the big city because of her pregnancy,
eventually sinking to prostitution. 76
It would seem that illegitmate children were often registered as foundlings, as
Father Porcar recorded in his journal in 1619, when his superior, the parish priest
of Saint Martin (Valencia) wanted to register the name of the father of an infant
presented ‘secretly’ for baptism. The vicar general of the diocese, ‘with his customary
prudence, in view of the great problems which might arise from writing down the
names of the parents of infants brought in secretly, advised that names should not
be entered, but that the old custom be kept of calling the baby a “child of Saint
Martin”’. 77 We know from other sources that unclaimed children born in villages
were liable to be carted off, because there was no money to pay for their rearing,
and to end up as foundlings at the door of some church or household in the
neighbouring city. This makes it difficult to establish illegitimacy ratios with any
exactness, but we estimated in Chapter 2 that 2–3 per cent of the newly born in
the countryside and 10 per cent or more in cities might have to grow up without
recognised parents.
One of the great features of the early modern period was, indeed, the increased
provision for foundlings. There were charitable confraternities set up for this
purpose in Toledo in 1504, Valencia in 1537, Valladolid in 1540. That of Seville
was founded in 1558 to remedy ‘the frequent distress of finding in its streets
and squares and at the gates of its temples innumerable newborn children’, who
were often killed by the cold or by scavenging dogs. In spite of its efforts, though,
perhaps only a quarter of the inmates taken into the foundling home would
survive the first months of life. 78 The Enlightenment saw further strides in Spain
as in the rest of Europe to implement a more ‘humanitarian’ and more socially
efficient policy towards the illegitimate, admitting them to guilds and trying to
reform the foundling homes. But the general trend of the early modern period
was rather towards discriminating against those ‘born outside the family’. As
the humanist educator López de Montoya put it, fornication was not only a sin
but inflicted ‘injury’ on the offspring of such liaisons, ‘who can usually not be
reared in a fitting manner’. While Spain was a frontier land, manpower was
valued and its origins not too rigorously scrutinised. In a more ordered society
the presence of the illegitimate was troublesome. As the political writer Fernández
Navarrete suggested in 1626, it seemed unwise to entrust those of uncertain
215THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
parentage with positions of responsibility in the commonwealth, ‘since they have
no property to lose nor honour to stain’. 79
The emphasis was, therefore, increasingly on the proper rearing of future
citizens within a formally constituted household. In spite of—or because of— the
shortness of life, enormous fuss was made of children in early modern Spain,
and their births and their tragically early deaths were the occasion of great ceremony.
Bernardo Catalá’s diary pays considerable attention to these events. He describes
his anxiety at the difficult birth of his daughter Ana in 1600, placing a relic of
the True Cross, which he always carried about with him, on his wife’s abdomen
while she was in labour. And Estefanía de Requesens told her mother how her
husband had encouraged her for half an hour as she sat in labour on the birthing-
chair in 1538. 80 Birth was, though, mainly an occasion for the solidarity of the
womenfolk to express itself: ‘neighbours, relatives and friends gather round to
help a woman in labour—the event suspends any quarrels or spiteful gossip there
might be’. And then when it came to the baptism, a wider gathering of the clan
would take place—something which preoccupied the Catholic Kings on the score
of public order, as they legislated in 1493 against the customs of north-western
Spain of having large numbers of kinsmen assemble, with feasting for more
than one day. 81
Esteban de Garibay described the excitement and discussion which went on
over the choice of names and godparents for the newly born, for a child embodied
the hopes of a dynasty and served to consolidate ties between the household
and a wider world. Thus, a week after the birth of his eldest son in 1581, he was
visiting his ‘great protector’ and fellow Basque Doña Ana Manrique, who, on
being informed that the child had not yet been baptised (because the kin could
not agree on a name, in part), ‘told me that he was to be called Luis, and that
the godfather would be her son Don Luis de Vargas Manrique’. Choosing godparents
could be difficult. Estefanía de Requesens wrote to her mother in 1535 that the
norm at court was three godmothers and two godfathers for a girl, but that she
and her husband had decided to choose lowly people of virtue, in order to avoid
having to pick and choose from among their own circle of friends, divided as
these were by ‘passions’. 82 The Council of Trent (1563) reduced godparents to
one of each sex in order to emphasise the spiritual rather than the social function
of this tie. But still in 1607 Bernardo Catalá noted how important the gathering
of the kin was in León, where baptism was delayed for a week in order to facilitate
it (the pious Catalá had his children baptised within a day of birth). As late as
1675 the merchant Lantery was prepared to delay the baptism of his new offspring
for several months, until the return of the chosen godfather from Honduras—
‘which caused my heart, and that of its mother, to miss several beats’, in case
the babe died in the interval and was consigned to Limbo. 83 Godparents often
remained close friends of the family. The duke of Sessa reminded Lerma around
1618-rather inappropriately, perhaps, on the eve of the great minister’s fall from
power —that he had stood as sponsor at the baptism of the count of Cabra,
216THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
Sessa’s son and heir, so that ‘since he is so much your child, you should be
interested in his welfare’. 84
But clearly it was the relationship between parents and children that increasingly
interested early modern writers. Fray Luis de León was at pains to encourage the
‘Perfect Married Woman’, aristocrat or not, to nourish the new-born with her
own milk: nurture in the womb only lasts nine months, but the formative period
of suckling twenty-four. ‘Will the mother not be well paid for her efforts when
she holds him naked on her lap,’ he commented, ‘when he plays with her breast...when
he looks at her with a smile, when he gurgles?’ And a little before the humanist
Pedro de Luxán had emphasised the rewards for the caring mother, ‘when she
sees her infant break into a laugh, or make a face as though to cry, or ask for his
gruel, or run his hand over her breast and even pull at her coif, running his hands
over his parents’ chins and saying a thousand funny little things’. 85 Some aristocratic
mothers did breast-feed their offspring. Garibay was ‘often told’ by his parents
that ‘I was suckled by my mother until she felt she was pregnant with my brother
the priest’, whereupon he was handed over to a wet-nurse. His wife suckled in
turn their own son Luis, ‘until at fourteen months, feeling herself pregnant, she
gave him over to wet-nurses’. The norm seems to have been about eighteen months
on the breast; but when Luis de Garibay was weaned at this age in July 1583, he
lost his appetite and his face swelled up with fever, so that he had to be put back
on the breast again for a few more months. 86
Estefanía de Requesens’s correspondence with her mother in the 1530s is one
of our best sources of information on the early years of life. She did not give the
breast, but brought the wet-nurses into her own (rather cramped) apartment in
the royal palace. Though both she and the wet-nurse would fondle the infant
Juan, she wrote that it was only the nurse who could get him to stop crying: but
‘he and I are also good friends, and he speaks to me more than to anyone else, I
would say’. The lesser aristocracy seem to have given their children out to be
suckled, though usually within the same town or neighbourhood, keeping a close
enough eye on their welfare. Thus, Bernardo Catalá recorded in his diary how he
had his second son, Benito, brought home from the wet-nurse’s house on 9 December
1600 because he had contracted smallpox (viruelas) —he had been born on 20
April 1599. 87
Infant deaths, however common, were felt keenly by the parents, though in a
religious age, it was some consolation to feel that the little one was ‘with the angels’,
as Bernardo Catalá put it when his infant daughter ‘Estefanita’ died of smallpox (or
perhaps measles). An elaborate network of protection had to be woven round these
fragile lives, involving recourse to astrology in part (Garibay and others took care
to determine the exact date of each child’s birth in order to prognosticate the influences
affecting its future life), but mostly to medicine and religion. When Luis de Garibay
sickened in 1583, just after he had been weaned at eighteen months, he was dressed
solemnly in a little habit of a Dominican monk, in honour of Saint Vincent Ferrer,
who interceded for him and restored him to health (as the grateful parent duly
217THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
recorded). When new fevers struck him in October 1584, he was taken to the Dominican
convent in Toledo, and there, before the altar of Saint Vincent Ferrer, he was again
robed as a Dominican friar. In June 1585, attacked once more by tertian fevers, the
three-year-old was bled by the doctors (three ‘ounces’ of blood), while the mother,
‘in a very tearful state’, had to leave the room. ‘I made a vow,’ recalled the father,
‘on bended knee at the bedside of the child, that I would go on pilgrimage’—once
again, to the Dominican convent, but now to the great one in Valencia, where Saint
Vincent Ferrer had taken his own vows. 88
Those youngsters who survived were subjected to an upbringing of some moral
rigour. After supper, Pedro de Luxán’s ideal father would have ‘everyone gather
round the fireplace’ and get one of the boys to read, while the mother and daughters
occupied themselves with their needlework. The servants, meanwhile, would be
sent to confession at the major festivals of the church year. The Toledan merchant
Gonzalo de la Palma would ask his sons for ‘an exact account of the sermon they
had heard at mass on holy days’. 89 The family was regarded as a nursery of future
citizens of a Christian commonwealth. Father Arbiol advised that fathers ‘must
be...zealous evangelists for the whole of their household’, and in free times after
meals must instruct both children and criados in the ways of God. The Jesuit Matías
Sánchez gave his readers an interesting personal insight into his own experience
in this regard: ‘It moves me now to recall the tears I would see in the eyes of my
family when they would get me to read to them the Lives of the Saints,’ 90
In Protestant countries the moral authority of the father may have tended to
grow as he assumed many of the roles of spiritual director for his little community.
In Spain the ‘holy’ was often located outside the household. Bernardo Catalá
describes how he and his wife would separately draw by lot the name of one of
the twelve Apostles, who would serve as their individual spiritual ‘counsellor’ for
the year ahead. In 1604 the simple domestic ceremony was interrupted by a protest
from the wife, ‘saying that since Otger [their son] was now nearly six years old
and could say his prayers, would I be so good as to let him draw a name for
himself .... Seeing that my wife was so determined, I said that if she would promise
to get Don Otger to say his prayer to the saint every day, I would let him draw.
She said she would, and that when the lad could not, she would say it for him.’ As
it turned out, Otger drew Saint James that year, like his mother, while his father
went under the patronage of Saint Andrew. 91 These spiritual divisions within the
home were reinforced by solidarity with confraternities. Occasionally Bernardo
and his wife would enter the same one, but mostly they seem to have gone different
ways in this regard.
Schooling began to occupy a major place in the life of the young during the
Renaissance. One of the great educators of Renaissance Spain, Pedro López de
Montoya, wrote in his treatise of 1595 that the proper upbringing of the nobility
must include training in letters, for these were a means of self-defence more suited
to rational man than weapons. 92 It was an attitude which one finds again in Castillo
de Bobadilla, and which indeed can be traced back to the fifteenth century and
218THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
the new chivalry proposed by Fernando del Pulgar. Pulgar’s ‘Noble Men’ (Claros
Varones) exercised self-restraint and used reason. Reinforcing the argument of the
Council of Trent (1563) that schooling should be more readily available for the
creation of a truly Christian commonwealth, the Cortes of Castile in 1577 affirmed:
‘Good religious teaching and training is very appropriate at all times and at every
age, but principally in a man’s tender years, for since he is naturally inclined
towards evil, if he is not set upright and placed on the path of virtue before vices
take hold of him, it will be very hard for him to mend his ways later.’ 93 Renaissance
optimisim about man had clearly given way here to Counter-Reformation pessimism,
but both attitudes stressed the importance of schooling in the formation of character.
Traditional forms of upbringing for the nobility had involved the departure of
youths from the ‘softness’ of the parental home as they entered their teens, to be
placed as pages or criados (‘foster-children’) in the household of some great personage,
baron, king or prelate. The bishops seem to have maintained this role for some
time after Renaissance ideas began to lay emphasis on learning rather than mere
courtliness. The first archbishop of Granada after its reconquest (1492), Hernando
de Talavera, kept 250 criados, we are told, and ‘his household was a seminary
where the younger sons of the great lords of Spain were brought up, as well as
other orphans...’. One of the leading prelates of the Counter-Reformation, Juan
de Ribera of Valencia, had regularly a score or more of noble youths in his palace
in the years between 1568 and 1611, for whom he purchased copies of the Classics,
especially Cicero. 94 What was missing in this educational system, perhaps, was
some sense of universality or systematisation. The chronicler of Archbishop Talavera
grouped together ‘younger sons of great lords’ and ‘other orphans’, because, as
he put it, ‘they are both poor in their different ways’. More favoured sixteenth-
century nobles, who did not have to seek a career in law or the church, might
follow their fathers to the wars, like the great duke of Alba (1507– 82), who was
on campaign from the age of six. The eldest son might withdraw from schooling
early, like the third duke of Alcalá (1583–1637), who was married off at fourteen
in order to ensure the continuity of the estate. As his Jesuit tutor commented, ‘he
passed from first letters to the marriage bed and the arms of Venus...leaving the
delights of literature and the sweet governance of his mother for the field of politics
and the troubles of married life’. 95 The actual effects of this educational pattern
might be investigated further: both Alba and Alcalá were cultivated men, though
the record of Alcalá’s litigation with a mistress later in life suggests a rather undisciplined
and overbearing character, at variance with the Counter-Reformation ideal.
The slow rise of the ‘school’ in the Renaissance, in place of the private
tutor may have had something to do with this concept of discipline. Certainly
the best masters were to be found there, suggested López de Montoya, as he
advised aristocratic parents to use the ‘public school’, hitherto associated more
with clerks and paupers. The sixteenth century saw some notable experiments
in Spain as in the rest of Western Europe—the foundation of the Casas de Doctrina
(‘Houses of Religious Instruction’) by Juan de Avila from 1554 onwards for
219THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
orphans, the Escuelas Pías (Escolapians) founded by the Catalan José de Calasanz
slightly later (though they first took root in Italy and only spread in Spain
during the eighteenth century, giving an artisan’s son, like Goya, his chance
of an education), and, of course, the Jesuits. 96 Drawing on the lessons of the
Renaissance, these schools emphasised the formation of character as a main
purpose of education, to be achieved through awakening the pupil’s curiosity
and ambition rather than through flogging.
The Jesuit schools merit particular study. In his life of the founder, Ignatius of
Loyola (1491–1556), Ribadeneira set out the extraordinary effect they were having:
‘the pacification of youth who were once obstreperous and rebellious, the peaceful
way they now live at home, their obedience towards their parents, their modest
behaviour towards their peers...’. Some people ask us, commented Ribadeneira,
why, unlike earlier friars who had taught in universities, we bother with grammar
schools for youngsters, hitherto left to hired hands—‘a new and unusual calling,
even out of keeping with the gravity of religious life’. The answer was partly the
need to combat Protestant heresy, but also to reform morals, for the loss of a good
conscience, ‘greed and an insatiable desire for money’, were, as Saint Paul suggested,
the slippery slope which led to a challenge to Faith itself. By 1572 Ribadeneira
could point to a record of unusual success: the Jesuit schools were growing in
number and changing social attitudes. After God’s providence, one might explain
this through their emphasis on instilling virtue in the pupil, through morning
prayers, evening examination of conscience and frequent confession, and paying
particular attention to any ‘weaknesses’ (siniestros) in the character of individuals,
as well as the more general ‘vices and waywardness which are typical and almost
inevitable at that age’. 97
This kind of supervision was costly in terms of manpower. ‘In other schools
one master has different orders of pupils, lesser, medium and upper...But the
Society [of Jesus] has its pupils separated out into their different classes, each
with its own particular master appointed for that purpose.’ The pioneering use
of the word ‘class’ in this text of 1572 foreshadows a new terminology which
would eventually be applied to the social hierarchy itself. Jesuit schooling was
disciplinarian, with censorship of the Classics, but it drew heavily on Renaissance
ideas of encouragement of the pupil and on fostering a sense of self-discipline.
Thus, great use was made of ‘new forms of instruction and new kinds of lectures
and debates’, with more emphasis on prize-giving than on the rod. The participation
of Jesuit pupils in school plays was, of course, to become famous. There was
also a pioneering use of prefects—síndicos or decuriones—and what we might now
call ‘student fraternities’, which grew out of the religious confraternity and which
became a badge of distinction for the aspiring pupil. The members of these
clubs, ‘through the offices and positions given to them, and through the rules
and regulations they draw up, have a forestaste of later life and start to become
a kind of citizen’. In 1625 the Jesuits were entrusted with the Imperial College
in Madrid, a new experiment in fashioning an educated elite, since the pupils
220THE POLICI NG OF THE FAMILY
would no longer be younger sons eager for a career in the church or bureaucracy,
but elder sons of the nobility, needing a general grounding in history, mathematics
and science. The Jesuit Order, ran the foundation statutes, ‘is the one which
most successfully fosters the education of the young, combining instruction in
letters with virtue and good character’. 98
Most young Spaniards, of course, never went to school at all, and few even of
the nobility passed through the hands of the Jesuits. Nevertheless, their model—
borrowed from some of the main stream of Renaissance thought—spread its influence
widely. The training for citizenship by means of self-discipline was to be a powerful
factor in the moulding of a new social hierarchy, whose ‘classes’ were based increasingly
on individual achievement. The noble must get used from an early age to a regular
rhythm of work during the day, advised Diego Gurrea, tutor to the dukes of Cardona,
in his educational handbook of 1627. Allowing more room for sport in the education
of the young than the Jesuits seem to have done, Gurrea nevertheless pointed to
the challenge facing a feudal aristocracy, of learning to control its passions. Physical
exercise must never be pushed to the limit where a man lost his temper or sense
of proportion: the hunter must not become as brutish as his prey. 99 This transformation
of social attitudes was, of course, gradual. The seed might be implanted in the
family and the school, but its fuller realisation depended on wider influences in
the society at large, and it is to one of the most significant of these—religion—that
we must now turn.
22110
THE COMMUNITY OF
THE FAITHFUL
The great Jesuit historian Juan de Mariana (1536–1624) wrote that the contemplation
of nature and of human frailty would convince all men of the existence of God. But
if men were left to themselves, ‘would there not shortly be as many religious opinions
scattered across the world, as many sacred rituals, as wide a variety of ecclesiastical
organisations as there are differences of opinion among men?’ Acceptance of such a
plurality would lead to wars between and within nations. ‘There is nothing...which
is so contrary to peace as having many religions in the same commonwealth...Nothing
has greater force when it comes to stirring up the populace than the mask of religion.’ 1
Spain had formed herself, of course, out of many centuries of religious struggle. At
the western edge of Christendom, she had been engaged since the Muslim invasion
of 711 in the Reconquest of the national territory, a confused affair which had at
times assumed the features of a crusade. The completion of the reconquest with the
overthrow of the last Muslim kingdom, Granada, in 1492 ushered in a new age of
cultural and religious imperialism. ‘Faith’ was listed by the cosmographer Pedro de
Medina, along with wine, wool, the overseas discoveries and good government, in
his treatise of 1548 exploring the ‘Great Things of Spain’. ‘The reason for our triumph
throughout the world is our faith, without which it is impossible to appease God...’
And a century later the geographer Rodrigo Méndez Silva could write in much the
same terms, that Spain, honoured by the preaching of the Apostle Saint James, guardian
of his shrine and defender of Christendom, is the land ‘which most firmly upholds
and venerates’ the Christian tradition. 2
There is, no doubt, a certain irony in all this, for within a few years Méndez
Silva would be arrested and penanced by the Inquisition for Judaic practices (1662),
a reminder, if any were needed, of the complex amalgamation of cultures that was
Spain. The exceptional ‘authority and severity’ of this tribunal in the Hispanic
world, thought the Venetian ambassador Donà in 1573, was ‘because the number
of New Christians, of Jewish and Moorish origin, is everywhere so great’, and,
given that they had been mostly forced into the church, ‘Spain would run a great
risk of being infected and losing its religion’. 3 It was in the struggle with the Jews
that the Inquisition was born. Sefarad (Spain) was home to one of the most numerous
and distinguished branches of that people, the Sephardic Jews. Men of eminence
222TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
in the towns, in learning as well as trade, they were the crucial bridge between
Islam and Christendom in the Middle Ages. Long centuries of coexistence came
gradually to an end for a variety of reasons, which have perhaps as much to do
with European as with purely Spanish developments—the rise of the preaching
friars, with their evangelical zeal, the fear induced by the Black Death, the messianic
fervour whipped up among a new kind of proletariat as towns grew. These movements
culminated in the Iberian peninsula with the great wave of pogroms in 1391,
followed by intermittent violence thereafter, in which Jews seem frequently to
have been made the scapegoat of conflict between a series of weak kings and their
overmighty subjects. 4 Mass conversions of Jews to Christianity merely created
the figure of the Converso, the New Christian, against whose alleged deviousness
further popular hostility was whipped up, culminating in the riots of Toledo and
the adoption by that city of a statute demanding limpieza de sangre (‘purity of blood’,
or Old Christian ancestry) for its officers in 1449.
The foundation of the Inquisition by Ferdinand and Isabel in 1478 can be seen
as part of the task of restoring public order after a century of civil conflict. Henceforth
it would be the sovereign, through state-appointed inquisitors (a wresting of power
here from the bishops), who would decide who was or was not a good Christian.
The measure was rounded out in 1492 by requiring the rest of the Jewish population
either to accept baptism or leave the country (up to 200,000 may have left). The
numerous remaining New Christians posed a challenge—unique in Europe at the
time—which was as much social and political as religious. In the first place there
was great opposition to the establishment of the Inquisition in many quarters.
The trading cities of the Crown of Aragon protested against a tribunal which had
its seat in Castile claiming to exercise jurisdiction over them, and were worried
about too rigorous an enquiry into the faith driving away trade. Without trade,
affirmed Valencia, ‘one cannot live happily or prosperously in cities, and the commonwealth
itself cannot be maintained’. 5 In the event, after the murder of Inquisitor Pedro de
Arbués in Zaragoza cathedral in 1485, opposition crumbled in the face of royal
determination.
Mariana would later echo some of the disquiet felt by the Converso and humanist
Pulgar (‘a man of sharp and elegant wit’), and others: that the Inquisition was too
rigorous, that its secrecy prevented the preparation of a proper defence, that the
sambenitos (the penitential tunics which those condemned by the court had to wear
for a time) were hung up in perpetuity in the local church, so that ‘children would
pay for the sins of their fathers...’. Most serious of all, in Mariana’s words, ‘through
those secret enquiries, the freedom to talk and listen to one another was taken
away, since there were people specially appointed in the cities, towns and villages
to report what was going on’. 6 In the words of ambassador Donà in 1573, ‘such is
the fear that everyone has of this tribunal that no one talks about or enquires into
its proceedings very much, for fear of becoming himself in any way an object of
suspicion’. Nevertheless, both Donà and Mariana seem to have concluded that
the exceptional nature of the threat to Spain required these sacrifices.
223TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
The most visible expression of the problem was no doubt to be found in the
frontier with Islam. Essentially the reconquest of much of Spain, notably of
Granada in 1492, had been achieved through negotiations with individual Moorish
cities and their rulers, who had obtained the safeguard of their lands and religion,
and extensive rights of self-government, in return for recognition of Christian
suzerainty. It would be misleading to talk of tolerance, but coexistence there
certainly was. Like the Jews, the Moors began to suffer increasing pressure during
the later Middle Ages—popular pogroms, like the sack of their quarter of Valencia
city in 1455, and the accumulation of restrictive legislation, such as the ban on
the muezzin calling to prayer from the minaret (though mosques themselves
remained open), the prohibition on work during Christian holy days, the adoption
of rules by some guilds excluding non-Christians... 7 Though the Treaty of Granada
proclaimed toleration, this quickly broke down. The reasons would seem to be
a mixture of evangelical and social pressure from at least some sections of the
victorious camp. Even the gentle Hernando de Talavera, archbishop of Granada
(1492–1507), though happy to use Moorish song and dance in the Corpus Christi
processions and rejecting the use of force, was a keen evangelist, preaching through
the hill country, and also trying to get the local people to accept ‘Christian customs,
sitting in chairs and eating our food’. He would also get them to dress ‘in the
Castilian way’, and distribute benches and tables to the poor, ‘so that they would
not eat on the floor’. 8 Immigration of Christians in search of land and work
created familiar problems of social conflict. Though the Moors had been guaranteed
the right to property, it became increasingly difficult to maintain this once the
notarial registers began to be kept in the language of the conquerors (virtually
everywhere in Granada from the 1520s). It was hard for an Arabic-speaking
peasantry to secure a fair hearing in court against usurers and land-grabbers.
Diego Hurtado de Mendoza commented on the effects of the official enquiry
into title to land in Granada conducted by the government after 1559: ‘The
New Christians, lacking a tongue and with no friends, found sentence given
against them, their farms taken away or divided up, though they were theirs,
purchased by them or inherited from their forefathers.’ 9
This pressure is reflected in the statistics of demography. Between 1492 and
1568 the Moors seem to have fallen to about half of the population of the kingdom
of Granada, while those of Valencia fell between the thirteenth-century reconquest
there and the mid-fourteenth century to about one-third. It was in this unstable
environment that conflict erupted—popular disturbances, Muslim resistance, royal
intervention. The flash-point in Granada was the very basic question of mixed
marriages. Islam exerted an attraction on the humbler people of Christian Europe
during the Middle Ages and beyond—a refuge for the oppressed, where they could
rise to positions of authority. Fray Diego de Haedo found Algiers in 1612 virtually
in the hands of these ‘Renegades’, as they were known—about 6,000 of them,
holding ‘almost all the power, dominion, government and wealth’. 10 When the
Christians entered Granada after 1492, they were particularly keen to win these
224TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
people back, which often meant breaking up families. Tensions here erupted in
the first Moorish rising of 1499–1501, which gave the Catholic Kings the excuse
to tear up the treaty of 1492 and offer all Muslims living in the Crown of Castile
the choice of baptism or exile. Solemn promises by the Crown to the worried
seigneurs of Valencia in the Cortes of 1510, that the Moorish peasants there would
not be converted by force, eventually collapsed in the revolt of the Germanías
(1519–22). The rebel armies combined godly zeal with anti-seigneurial venom by
invading the aljamas (Muslim communities) and offering their inhabitants the choice
of baptism or death. After the suppression of the revolt, the Crown found it prudent
to accept this development and to proclaim the end of Islam throughout the Crown
of Aragon.
The problem was now one of assimilating the new converts. At first there was
confidence that much could be achieved by preaching and teaching, and, symptomatic
of the optimism of this period, the concordias of 1526 and 1528 promised the Moriscos
(as the converts were known) that the Inquisition would not be too rigorous in
enquiring into the relics of Islamic practice among them, at least for a term of
forty years during which they must be instructed in Christianity. But looking
back on a wasted opportunity, one observer around 1570 commented: ‘I do not
know why it is that we are so blind...that we go off to convert the infidels of
Japan, China and other remote parts...rather as if someone had his house full of
snakes and scorpions, yet took no care to clean it but went to hunt for lions or
ostriches in Africa.’ 11 Certainly there were constant complaints that the mission to
the Arabic peoples of the peninsula never attracted the enthusiasm accompanying
Spanish imperialism overseas, and, as late as 1604, there were proposals for instructing
preachers in Arabic so that they could perform more effectively. But Fray Jaime
Bleda, a Valencian Dominican and the leading spokesman for the ‘final solution’
of getting rid of the Moriscos altogether, believed that preaching was not the heart
of the problem. Based on his own experience as rector of Valencian parishes in
the 1580s and 1590s, he gave his opinion that this people rejected Christianity
not out of ‘ignorance’ but out of ‘malice’. 12
By the time Bleda was active the Morisco question had anyway changed, as
Renaissance optimism gave way to Counter-Reformation pessimism about the nature
of man. In the 1560s the forty years of grace conceded by the concordias for the
Moriscos to learn about Christianity came to an end, coinciding with the Council
of Trent and the advent of the more combative monarchy of Philip II. Old measures
prohibiting the Arabic language and customs were resurrected in 1566, despite
the appeal of Francisco Núñez Muley, spokesman of the Granadans, that Egyptian
Christians spoke Arabic and that the dress and music of Granada were regional,
not religious, and names a way of identifying families rather than proclaiming
Islam. 13 Even the acerbic Bleda was later to criticise this policy — maintained by
the secular authorities—as mistaken: if the members of the Junta for Morisco affairs
in Madrid only knew, he commented, that ‘the greatest alfaquíes (jurists and teachers)
are quite happy to dress in the Christian way’. In fact, what is clear is the great
225TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
difficulty contemporaries had in distinguishing between ritual and belief, between
the social customs of the Moors and their separate culture. It is significant that it
was the alfaquí, the man of law, who became the religious leader of the Moriscos
after open adherence to Islam became impossible, maintaining a set of rules relating
to every aspect of daily life.
The various tensions in Granada were exacerbated by the decrees of 1566 on
language and customs, erupting in the great Second Revolt of the Alpujarras (1568–
70), whose costly suppression led to the dispersal of the Granadans throughout
Castile. Thereafter the Morisco problem became essentially a Valencian and, to a
lesser extent, Aragonese one, with the aljamas there trying to maintain their identity,
with some support from the feudal aristocracy, against the enveloping tide of an
ecclesiastical and royal bureaucracy. In this last phase of Moorish Spain the Inquisition
acquired increasing importance, but so too did the parish. The parish structure was
very imperfect, to be sure, but it generated a new routine of religious observance,
reflected still in the registers of baptisms, marriages and burials from the last quarter
of the sixteenth century, which throw interesting and, indeed, unusual light on the
demography of a non-Christian population. Attempts to set up parishes in Muslim
areas had begun in Valencia in 1535, but made only slow headway, given the costs
involved: the destruction or rebuilding of the mosque, the endowment of a resident
priest. It was found that the habices—rents from fields, houses or the like, used to
support the mosque— were too small to pay for the more elaborate worship of Christians.
The traditional Christian resource, the tithe of crops (which Moors were obliged to
pay after their conversion), went mostly to bishops and cathedral chapters or to the
seigneurs and the Crown, with only a small share—the first fruits or primicias— reserved
for the parish. The initial endowment of the Morisco parishes with 30 Valencian
pounds a year—less than a chantry priest could earn, as was pointed out at the
time—had to be augmented to 100 pounds in 1572. But the negotiations with cathedral
chapters and seigneurs which were required in order to provide the money dragged
on, and still in the early seventeenth century only 74 out of the proposed 129 Morisco
parishes in Valencia had reached this figure.
Lacking adequate funding, the parishes, nevertheless, came to constitute a rudimentary
framework within which the Morisco people had now to live out their lives. Stricter
control was thus kept over the various stages of the life-cycle. Midwives were
supposed to be Old Christians, and Bleda thought it would be difficult for the
inhabitants of the relatively compact aljamas to keep births secret— even if the
holy oils were washed off as soon as the infant was brought home, where a separate
naming ceremony would take place. Marriages were conducted by the priest, but
the latter generally did not stay long enough in a particular village to become
familiar with names and relationships, and Bleda may be right to suggest—based
on his own eight years as a parish priest—that the canonical norms on dispensations
of consanguinity, bigamy or divorce simply could not be enforced. As the bishop
of Orihuela suggested in 1595, for the Moriscos the real marriage was the contract
drawn up by the alfaquí. The few examples which have come to light indicate the
226TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
survival of Islamic bridewealth (the endowment of the bride by the groom) rather
than European dowry, and suggest how a separate culture continued to flourish
at the very basic level of the family. Muslim rituals of death—turning of the dying
person to face east, burial in virgin soil—were combated from the 1570s by increasingly
strict injunctions that the priest must be called to the bedside of sick Moriscos,
and must witness the laying of the corpse in the grave.
The priests were aware, commented Bleda, that ‘the Moriscos were not playing
fair, but since the poor fellows had to live among them, and on the scant income
they got from them, they did not dare open their mouths’. Similarly, the constables
responsible for enforcing edicts against Muslim practices were subject to great
pressures within the small communities where they operated. During the fasting
month of Ramadan, ‘sometimes they would go into the houses to eat with them,
when they saw the inhabitants, as the first star appeared in the sky, close their
doors and make ready the first meal of the day’. Butchers, who by law had to be
Christian, were also to be found slitting the throats of animals in the ritual way of
Islam in order to find customers. 14 There was, of course, the risk of intervention
by the Inquisition. Bleda suggests that most Moriscos escaped with a warning and
with some public penance, but paid little real heed to the censures of that tribunal.
This was especially the case after 1571, when the Morisco leaders of Valencia
managed to negotiate a concession from the Crown that, in return for an annual
subsidy from the aljamas, the Inquisition would in no circumstances confiscate
property. This had been a long-standing demand of the Valencian seigneurs, on
whose estates the Moriscos mostly lived and who were anxious to avoid damage
to the rural economy.
Certainly the Inquisition over the years managed to destroy much of the formal
apparatus of Islam. But the alfaquís, through their knowledge of the rites and their
activity in circumcision, marriage contracts, preparation of the dead for burial,
and the like, managed to keep alive a flourishing underground religion. It was
among them that a quite extensive clandestine literature circulated, writings in
either Arabic or aljamía (Castilian in Arabic characters). This last echo of the glorious
literary heritage of Al Andalus had shed its former interest in secular themes, and
now concentrated mostly on religion—a conservative adherence to the works of
the past, though curiously deviating into folk culture, with apocryphal lives of
Mohammed and verses designed to ward off sickness or the evil eye. 15 ‘In each
house, in every corner, we have found even primers for children, with the commands
of Mohammed written in verse,’ wrote Aznar Cardona in 1610. And certainly one
prominent feature of this clandestine literature was its polemical nature—its utter
rejection of Christianity. 16
One of the Morisco leaders of Valencia, Don Cosme Abenamir—who had been
offered a post as familiar of the Inquisition around 1560 in an attempt to win over
men who were regarded as reliable and influential—was arrested in January 1568.
Under interrogation, he confessed that though he had gone to confession ‘now
and again’, yet ‘in his heart he was never [a Christian]’. His mother had brought
227TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
him up to believe that Christ and Mohammed were both prophets, and had taught
him the zalá, the ritual prayer said five times a day, as well as to observe the fast of
Ramadan. He had no books in Arabic, though—other than his own book of accounts—
and could remember little of the Koran. A protégé of the powerful duke of Segorbe,
Don Cosme seems to have been one of those who negotiated the royal concession
of 1571, exempting Moriscos from confiscation of property for heresy, and he
also obtained that year a pardon for himself. When the duke, his protector, died
in 1575, Don Cosme’s position became vulnerable once more, and he was rearrested
for continuing to live as a Muslim. 17
This case suggests some of the informal protection which the Moriscos enjoyed.
One of the surprising features to emerge from Bleda’s account of his own determined
campaign against this people from the 1580s, is how little interest or support he
managed to get from his ecclesiastical colleagues. Even that great Counter-Reformation
prelate, Archbishop Ribera of Valencia, seems to have been somewhat hesitant,
believing that the Moriscos were not going to become true Christians, but reluctant
to proceed with too much rigour because of the social and political implications.
Anyway, all measures had to pass through a government junta in Madrid, ‘than
whom no one knew less about the Morisco question’. Here was dominant the
‘abominable sect of the políticos’ —an early example of the borrowing of a word
coined to apply to the moderates in the French Wars of Religion in the 1590s,
who believed that toleration was a greater virtue than the religious fanaticism
which tore the commonwealth apart. 18 One of the members of the Junta in the
1580s was Don Jerónimo de Corella, heir to the count of Cocentaina, on whose
estates lived the wealthy Morisco Gaspar Masot—‘mi amigo’, as Don Jerónimo addressed
him when he borrowed money, and among whose books at his death in 1602 was
to be found an Arabic manuscript with lives of Muslim heros and popular devotions. 19
The reason why the government eventually began to shift its attitude on the Morisco
question and adopt a policy of rigour is complex. The seigneurs themselves were, no
doubt, coming increasingly under the sway of the Counter-Reformation. The trial of
Don Sancho de Cardona, Admiral of Aragon, in 1569 for obstructing the work of
evangelisation on his estates marked something of a turning-point—the end of the
old, free-wheeling seigneurs who had been a law unto themselves. One notes from
the 1580s an increase in litigation between the aljamas and their feudal lords over
rents, as the economic situation began to deteriorate—even Gaspar Masot towards the
end of his life was engaged in this kind of confrontation. The Old Christian population
in Valencia had advanced by 45 per cent to 65,016 households between 1565 and
1609, whereas the Moriscos had increased by 70 per cent over the same interval to
31,715. 20 This marked a reversal of earlier trends which had seen the minority everywhere
on the retreat, and generated increasing fear and suspicion on the part of the majority,
as it lost confidence in itself. San Luis Beltrán was already stirring fear by his prophecies
from the 1570s that the recurring bad harvests were a mark of God’s anger with Spain
for tolerating heretics in its midst, and that worse was to follow. The anti-Morisco
zealot Bleda got his first hearing in official circles as translator of the documents for
228TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
the canonisation process of this influential seer, who had interestingly started out as
an apostle to the American Indians.
No doubt, it would have required more than a handful of zealots to force the
hand of the government. The old argument that the Moriscos were a ‘fifth column’,
a potential ally of Spain’s enemy, the Ottoman Turk, was no longer so relevant as it
had been, since the great victory of Lepanto (1571) and the gradual retreat of that
power into prolonged confrontation with Persia. Nevertheless, the situation in the
Barbary States was worrying, with continuing corsair raids against the shipping
and coastal villages of the peninsula, and a civil war in Morocco between 1603 and
1610, which the Spanish candidate was losing. 21 Plots and rumours of plots—of a
Morisco uprising in alliance with the French or the English —abounded around
1600. How seriously to take all this is unclear. Clearly, there was much Morisco
unrest, and prophecies circulated in manuscript among this people foretelling the
triumph of the Turk and keeping alive a sense of resistance. 22 Rather like the hunt
for scapegoats at all times and all places, the evidence of unrest fuelled Christian
fears, and led to the fatal denouement of 1609–14—the decision to uproot 275,000
men, women and children, herd them to the ports and transport them by ship to
North Africa. The scale of the upheaval was not perhaps so very great at the level
of the Spanish population as a whole— though close to one in twenty-five must have
been Morisco at the time; but in the case of Aragon, and especially Valencia (one in
every three persons affected) it was traumatic. Arguments continue about the economic
effects, but certainly the event brought down the curtain on the cultural pluralism
typical of medieval Iberia, and ushered in a more integrated kind of society.
The activity of the Inquisition peaked around 1580–1600 and then began a
period of steady decline. A new concern with economics shaped the work of the
arbitristas, as attempts were made to halt Spanish decline, and greater pragmatism
was visible in relations with foreign countries. Thus, following the treaty of 1604
which brought to an end hostilities with Protestant England, the Inquisition was
told not to investigate sailors of that nation in Spanish ports, ‘so that the reign of
commerce which will flow from the peace may not turn out sterile, as would happen
if the subjects of His Majesty, the King of England...were to be arrested and molested
on grounds of religion’. Foreign residents from Protestant countries had still to
take care in the seventeenth century, especially in time of war; but generally, if
they maintained a discreet behaviour and gave no cause for scandal, the Inquisition
would not open windows into their souls. By 1787 when the Wiltshire rector,
Joseph Townsend, could praise one of the Inquisitors of Granada whom he met as
a man of ‘much learning and notable humanity’, the archbishop jokingly commented:
‘The Inquisitors of the present day were become more gentle than their fathers...but
they have not yet forgot the taste of blood.’ 23
Overall, cases of heresy—Jews, Moriscos, Protestants (almost all foreigners) —
accounted for only about 40 per cent of Inquisition business between 1540 and
1700, as the tribunal became more concerned instead with policing the faith and
morals of the majority Old Christian population. Their so-called ‘lesser offences’
229TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
reveal how tenuous was the hold of official Catholicism on the bulk of the peasantry.
In Galicia, reported the Inquisitors in 1585, those who deny the bodily presence
of Christ in the Eucharist are very numerous, but err ‘more through ignorance
than malice’. Many deny the Virgin Birth, ‘out of sheer dull-wittedness rather
than a desire to offend’; nevertheless, ‘they give great scandal and make it hard
for the church to get its message across’. 24 These so-called ‘propositions’ or ‘blasphemies’,
together with ‘superstitions’ (belief in magic or witchcraft) either attracted a warning,
or ‘abjuration’ of slight or grave suspicion of heresy. Thus, one Galician peasant
who had denied that Mary could have given birth to Christ without losing her
virginity was sentenced to attend high mass with a gag in his mouth, followed by
200 lashes and a prohibition on his coming nearer than six leagues (about 30
kilometres) to his village for the next five years.
The severity of these punishments seems to have depended on family background,
with more indulgence shown towards the nobility and those of Old Christian ancestry.
Formal heretics were ‘reconciled’ to the church, losing their property and being
gaoled for a period, and perhaps appearing at one of the formal autos de fe in penitential
garb (the sambenito), which would then be hung up in the local church, to the eternal
shame of one’s family. The autos de fe were increasingly costly spectacles—great processions
and preachings, which might last a day or more—and many tribunals found it hard
to afford them with much frequency. They were followed by the separate execution
of those who had lapsed into heresy a second time and were ‘relaxed’ to the secular
authorities for burning (being garrotted first if they showed any repentance). Only
3 or 4 per cent of trials ended with a death sentence, and about half of these were
against those who had escaped abroad anyway. 25
By the seventeenth century the Inquisition was becoming a great, privileged
corporation, symbol of an orthodoxy which was no longer really in question.
The tours of their jurisdictions by the Inquisitors in person began to fade from
the later sixteenth century, as the tribunals became more sedentary and bureaucratic.
From about 1620 in Galicia, the Inquisitors, who had hitherto been outsiders,
came to be drawn from the families of local notables, while the lesser agents of
the court— comisarios and familiars—equally reflected the aspirations for dignity
and power of Galician gentry and wealthy peasants. 26 But, as the function of these
dignitaries became less evident, complaints arose. The Cortes of Aragon in 1563
protested that there were too many officials, and that they enjoyed excessive privileges
‘both in buying and selling food and other things, and in irrigation and other
rights connected with their houses and fields’. The Cortes of Castile echoed this:
Inquisitors enjoyed the right of purveyance—buying up supplies cheaply for their
own households—but their officers abused it by reselling on the black market. Yet,
if the municipal magistrate intervened, he was liable to be arrested and thrown in
the Inquisition gaol, inmates of which were tarred for life with the suspicion of
heresy. 27 Concordias of 1553 (Castile) and 1568 (Aragon) allowed the Inquisition
jurisdiction over its own members in civil matters where they were the defendants,
and in petty criminal offences, though graver crimes were to be referred to the
230TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
royal courts. These ‘Agreements’ also sought to place an upper limit on the numbers
of laymen who could be admitted as familiars, or spies, of the tribunal —no more
than four in communities of 500 households, rising to a maximum of fifty in the
biggest cities, Granada, Seville and Toledo.
The familiars actually played very little role in bringing suspects before the Holy
Office; rather, they were positions conferring social status, particularly the valued
certificate of ‘purity of blood’ (limpieza de sangre) —that one’s family background had
been investigated and no record found of heresy. ‘A noble kingdom is one in which
no vassal is considered of vile lineage, nor humiliated for his background...How
can there be justice if some are despised and humiliated from generation to generation?’
The words of the great sixteenth-century Spanish theologian and poet, Fray Luis de
León, himself of Converso origin suggest the terrible damage done to the social
fabric by the perpetuation of the shame of those penanced by the Holy Office—the
innuendo and feuding which could grow up around it. 28 The limpieza statutes had
spread from the town council of Cordoba in 1449 to the Jeronimite friars in 1495,
who, following a scandal over the secret Judaism of prominent members, demanded
that new entrants demonstrate that their great-grandparents had been Old Christians.
Then the cathedral chapter of Seville in 1515 excluded those whose parents had
been converted from the Hebrew faith, and the movement culminated with the
bitterly contested statute for the cathedral of Toledo, approved by Philip II in 1556. 29
The measures were designed fundamentally against the Jews, since they, unlike the
Moors, were an urban, professional class who competed for the top positions in
church and state. They were patchy in their incidence: the more prestigious university
colleges adopted them, the Military Orders, about a third of the cathedral chapters,
individual convents...The Jesuits held out for a period, but, with their college in
Cordoba, for example, suffering from ‘an ill fame that only Jews go there’, were
eventually persuaded to adopt limpieza for entrants to their order in 1593. 30
What was the religion of the Conversos? The great humanist Pulgar, who was
one himself, suggested around 1485 that the Inquisition was fundamentally mistaken
in its aims. Judaisers, ‘in great ignorance and danger to their souls, kept neither
the one nor the other law correctly, because they were not circumcised like Jews...and
although they observed the Sabbath and some Jewish fasts, they did not observe
all the Sabbaths nor all the fasts’. 31 In later days, Judaism seems to have survived
only at the level of domestic ritual and family memory. And when I was six years
old my parents told me that I am a Jew’: the memoir of the younger brother of the
great Spanish/Portuguese doctor Isaac (‘Fernando’) Cardoso, who was born around
1603–4, provides a brief glimpse into a world which had perforce to remain hidden.
It was more usual to keep the fact of Jewishness hidden from children so young,
for fear of indiscretion, and the Cardosos seem to have been given a fairly conventional
Christian upbringing, though with a perhaps unusual space found for reading the
Bible—in Latin. 32 Some Conversos eventually declared themselves openly Jews in
the safety of Venice or Amsterdam —or in Brazil, after it was occupied by the
Dutch between 1630 and 1654.
231TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
On the other hand, the great number of very orthodox Christians of Jewish
family in Spain—the humanist Luis Vives, the poet Fray Luis de León, the saintly
Teresa of Avila—has to be borne in mind. One would hardly guess from the outward
circumstances of Vives’s life that it was overshadowed by tragedy—the burning by
the Inquisition in Valencia of his father for having lapsed into Judaism. Though
the penance imposed on Saint Teresa’s grandfather, a merchant of Toledo, for the
same fault in 1485, was thrown in the face of her father when he tried to establish
his nobility in Avila 1520, powerful friends there managed to swing the verdict of
the court in favour of the family. The Cortes of 1551 complained that grandchildren
of persons condemned by the Holy Office were not supposed to hold municipal
office, ‘but since such people are all wealthy, they obtain validation of their status
from Your Majesty by favour’. And the deputy from Avila to the Cortes of 1618
was sure that investigations of genealogy were only an opportunity for lying and
feuding, ‘for the only nobility or limpieza in Spain nowadays is whether a man is
well liked or not, or whether he has the means and adroitness with which to
purchase it’. 33
The role of religion in assuring political stability was taken as axiomatic. Beware
of religious innovators, warned López Bravo, ‘those who, dreaming up new ways
of understanding or worshipping God, fill with sedition the fickle mind of the
people’. 34 Certainly the link between Christianity and the state had become very
close in the crusader kingdoms of Spain, culminating with the pope’s concession
to the Crown of the right to appoint to all major benefices in the recently conquered
territory of Granada, extended to the presentation to bishoprics throughout Spain
in 1523. Bishops were arms of the monarchy. On 26 October 1588 Philip II wrote
to them in connection with the Enterprise of England: ‘I would ask you affectionately
that through preachers, confessors and other grave persons you would try to intimate
to those who have votes in the town councils the obligation upon them to assist
us at the present time...without anyone suspecting that I have written to you
about this.’ But divine guidance was notoriously slippery, and already in 1576 the
corregidor of Murcia had reported that confessors were placing scruples in the minds
of the councillors about the level of taxation — ‘but knowing exactly what they
said is impossible, since the advice was given in confession’. 35 Though the kind of
open confrontation which the Puritans indulged in with the governments of Elizabeth
or the early Stuarts was not visible in Spain, religion was still a two-edged sword.
The lower clergy joined the Catalan revolt of 1640, chasing out Castilian bishops.
And after the suppression of the revolt in 1652, the government ordered parish
priests there ‘on every holy day, at high mass where most people are present,
from the pulpit or the foot of the altar, to proclaim to their flock how greatly they
must attend to the service of His Majesty’. 36 When the papacy hesitated about
recognising this Habsburg victory, delaying the confirmation of royal nominees
for the vacant sees of Barcelona and Urgell, the Council of Aragon advocated a
tough response. Vice-chancellor Crespí, a devout Catholic, agonised over the issue:
the king was ‘head of the church in everything other than matters of faith’, and
232TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
the pope could err ‘as a man’; but one must never press things to a ‘rupture’, but
rather play for time, trusting that God would restore the king’s rights over his
bishops ‘in ways which human endeavour could not envisage’. 37
It is true that by this time bishops were coming to play a less active political
role, partly under the prompting of the Council of Trent, which had wanted them
to reside in their sees rather than at the king’s court. But at the local level they
continued to wield enormous influence. ‘The greatest calamities which have befallen
our community,’ wrote the chronicler of Segovia, ‘have occurred when its bishops
were not around or had died.’ 38 And he, like Ortiz de Zúñiga for Seville, painted
a vivid picture of the role of the prelate in pacifying feuds between warring families.
Even the somewhat controversial Archbishop Aliaga of Valencia (1611–48), who
had fallen foul of the jurats and the cathedral chapter over jurisdictional matters,
was welcomed back from the Cortes of Monzón in 1626 to the loud peal of church
bells, amid—as a diarist of the time put it—‘the joy we had at seeing our beloved
father and shepherd return to his home and his city’. 39
One has to remember the tremendous influence of the pulpit in an age when
alternative forms of instruction and entertainment were relatively restricted. Juan
Martín Cordero (born 1531) describes in his autobiography the public disputations
by university students which attracted ‘all the nobility and gentlemen’ of Valencia
to come and listen—a kind of testing of the oratorical skills on points of ethics or
morality, which won the fourteen-year-old Cordero a prize of three silver spoons
on one occasion. 40 At a lower level there was the popular preacher, like Fray Pere
Esteve (1582–1658), a Franciscan who could stand for an hour in the market
square of Valencia, holding spellbound a crowd of ‘porters, message-boys, idlers
and the like’. He spun homely yarns with a sharp political message—like the one
about the little man pestered by flies, but happy enough that they were no bigger
(partly referring, perhaps, to the French armies poised on the Valencian border
with Catalonia in the 1640s). 41
The most visible expression of the power of the church was its wealth. ‘I have
never been able to fathom,’ commented Joly as he surveyed the little diocese of
Osma, ‘how the clergy can have so much property, given the infertility and poverty
of Spain.’ The churches, to be sure, were not as well-built or as handsome as those
of France, but ‘they are better than ours in their fine gilded altarpieces, their
superb reliquaries, images and ornaments’. Of course, the French churches had
recently been plundered during the Wars of Religion, and Spaniards who had
grown wealthy in the Indies endowed theirs, ‘in fulfilment of vows they made
when threatened by the great perils and hazards of the sea’. 42 There was, indeed,
increasing concern about the wealth of the church as the economy entered a period
of decline. The reformer Lisón told the Cortes of 1621 that, on present trends, ‘in
a few years the greater part of landed property will belong to ecclesiastics’. This
was something of an exaggeration, but by the time reliable statistics become available,
in the cadastral survey of Ensenada (1750–54), the clergy accounted for about an
eighth of the assessed revenues of the population of the Crown of Castile. 43 In the
233TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Crown of Aragon there were medieval laws against mortmain, but monarchs allowed
the church to acquire land rather freely, on payment of a tax of a quarter of the
value, and often dispensing individual applicants from the tax on grounds of poverty.
The Cortes of Valencia in 1626 protested that convents ‘have acquired and are
acquiring much property of great value in the royal domain...so that they are
becoming the masters of the biggest and best part of the whole’; and—rather nervously
exempting church buildings from the ban, ‘for this reverence is due to the place
where the Most Holy Sacrament of the Eucharist is reserved’—they tried to stop
monasteries invading any more city space. 44
But it was perhaps the tithe—often close enough to the proverbial tenth of the
harvest, though its incidence varied enormously from place to place and crop to
crop—which aroused most controversy. One observer around 1600 wrote of the
great burden falling on the peasant, who often had not enough left over, after he
had paid his rent and other charges, for next year’s sowing. When he defaulted,
the authorities replied with excommunications, ‘whence it happens that in a village
of a hundred households there are usually a dozen excommunicated because of
the tithe’. Those who failed to purge their fault within the year were supposed to
be denounced to the Inquisition as ‘suspect in faith’; but this seems to have been
rare. One had to give scandal first—as did one man in Galicia who denounced the
tithe as of human, not divine origin, and urged that it be limited to what was
strictly necessary for the priest to live off and for the succour of the parish poor.
For his pains he was ordered by the Inquisition to abjure of ‘slight suspicion of
heresy’ in church before the assembled congregation, paying a fine of 800 ducats
and being banished from the village. 45 But in an increasingly commercialised society,
where the tithe was farmed out to businessmen for a lump sum and the proceeds
ended up mostly with bishops, chapters, feudal lords and the Crown, the tithe
became a subject of increasing controversy. The peppery Valencian jurist, Cerdán
de Tallada, who had conducted an investigation of ecclesiastical revenues in 1593,
argued that major reforms were needed here ‘for the conservation of our religion’.
There were too many clergy, the tithe was being abused, and monasteries too
often presented to the peasant the face of a grasping landlord than of a spiritual
guide. His Castilian contemporary, Castillo de Bobadilla, bore him out: ‘There
are some greedy prelates who are so lacking in charity that not only do they let
the people in their care suffer extreme hardship and let the sheep they shear perish
of hunger, but they will not even sell them the wheat they need for money’, preferring
to get a higher price on the urban market. 46
However, Spain would not follow the Protestant road. The great Jesuit philosopher-
historian, Mariana, argued that it was ‘a very grave error’ to seek to reduce the
church to the poverty of Apostolic times, for wealth was necessary to its authority,
and anyway more responsibly administered by it than by some greedy and ambitious
courtier. Defending the endowments of the Jesuit colleges, Ribadeneira wrote in
1572 that thanks to them the fathers were better able to devote themselves to
their principal task of education and evangelisation. And even a layman like the
234TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
deputy from Burgos to the Cortes of 1593–5 thought that ecclesiastical wealth
was an advantage to a community, since it gave employment and was recycled in
the form of alms, building of temples and upward mobility for priestly nephews. 47
In fact, the Spanish state made good use of ecclesiastical assets. It is true that
taxing the clergy provoked all kinds of political battles, after the government sought
to get them to contribute to the millones, the new excises on food from the 1590s.
In the Cortes of 1579–82 the always latent anti-clericalism surfaced when one of
the Madrid deputies announced that his reading of the Bible told him that the
clergy must pay taxes like any other citizen, and the pope did not need to be
asked for his permission. 48
But every six years frenzied negotiations in Madrid and Rome were needed in
order to secure the papal warrant authorising the collection of the millones from
priests. However, in other respects the state benefited greatly from its long association
with the crusade against the infidel, collecting the ‘third of the tithe’, for example,
and from 1567 also the entire tithe of the richest farm in the parish (the excusado).
The popes had given the king as well the right to sell Bulls of Crusade. The
sixteenth-century novel Lazarillo de Tormes satirised the trickery practised on the
peasants in order to get them to buy these indulgences; but one village Luther in
Galicia was given 200 lashes and banished by the Inquisition for two years for
attacking the Bull as a swindle. 49 It, together with the excusado and the ecclesiastical
donative or subsidio, brought in for the Crown as much as it received from the
Indies every year. Additionally, bishoprics were saddled with pensions to nominees
of the Crown—up to a third of their annual revenues under Philip I I.
The diversion of so many ecclesiastical revenues to the Crown (and to the seigneurs)
was matched by considerable inequality in the distribution of wealth within the
church itself. While the Valencian Cortes of 1626 complained of the growing wealth
of convents, they also pleaded on behalf of individual parish churches, which stood
in great need of money. The Morisco parishes, as we saw earlier, proved often
unable to get the cathedral chapters and the seigneurs to disgorge their shares of
the tithe. While the local magistrates clearly played an important role in maintaining
the church building itself, their funds were increasingly under strain thanks to royal
taxation in the seventeenth century. Bernardo Catalá de Valencia’s diary would
suggest that the gentry were reluctant to give up time and money to serve as churchwardens.
Some of this may be due to uncertainty about the actual pastoral role of the parish,
given that so many families and so many guilds had their own chapels and their
own endowments for masses to their patron saint.
The clergy were not only pastors, but men and women set apart by their
style of life, intermediaries with God through their holiness and prayer. Nuns,
for example, did little of the ‘practical’ work—nursing, teaching—for which they
became famed in the nineteenth century. Yet the reader of Saint Teresa of Avila
(1515–82) senses the excitement with which this woman founded her enclosed
communities— places where Christ would be honoured and from which a life of
self-denial and prayer might persuade God to take pity on the heretic and sinner
235TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
outside. ‘Fleeing from intercourse with the world, eating coarse food, wearing
very rough habits’ were not particularly meritorious acts in themselves, suggested
the Franciscan humanist Antonio de Guevara in 1529, but they were a way of
reducing the temptation to sin. Laymen could live a godly life, but ‘in truth,
among a thousand, you will barely find one who can abstain from sin when the
occasion presents itself. And shortly before, the humanist Pulgar had written a
moving letter to his twelve-year-old daughter who had chosen to become a nun.
In giving up her freedom for the cloister, she was in fact more free than those
she left behind in the world, including her sorrowing parents, who like the performers
in the bull-ring must scurry hither and thither, driven breathless by the hope
and fear of the moment. 50
As well as the monks and nuns, there were the chantry priests, men who fulfilled
no pastoral role but whose prayers kept open the bridge to the supernatural, across
which divine favour flowed. In Viciana’s chronicle of 1563–6 one notes the pride
with which local communities reported the numbers of such holy men. Onda,
with its 560 families, had its parish priest, but also 26 other capellanes or chantry
priests. More usually in towns of this size there would be about a dozen such
benefices, but up to 800 in the city of Valencia attached to its twelve parishes, in
each of which (according to Escolano) ‘they take pride in saying the offices and
celebrating the masses with the utmost attention to detail, so that each parish
looks as if it is a cathedral’. A great cycle of spirituality was, in fact, coming to an
end about this time; together with the changing economic climate, it meant that
Valencia had still only 771 benefices by the end of the Old Regime, and that other
towns of the kingdom were complaining that the endowments were now too small
to attract the full number of occupants. 51
Only a limited number of these priests received licences from the bishop to
confess sins or preach. Inevitably, therefore, a considerable responsibility fell upon
the friars to help out in pastoral work. Seville told the Cortes of 1623 that there
was a great need of Discalced Franciscans in the towns of its district to administer
the sacraments and hear confession. Castillo de Bobadilla was somewhat angry
that it was the municipal budget and not the tithe which had to pay for the summoning
of preachers and confessors during Lent every year. ‘The parish priests evade
their obligation by saying that they are no good at preaching and that they do
their duty by declaring the Gospel to the people on holy days, and that as regards
confession, they do what they can. So that the town itself has to invite in a friar
for both purposes’, giving him and his companion food and lodging and 100 reales
‘for books’. 52 Paralleling Castillo de Bobadilla’s concern about the cost of this to
small villages, more questions were beginning to be asked about whether Spain
needed or could afford so many clerics. Fernández Navarrete, himself a priest,
wrote in his great treatise of 1626 on the decline of his country, that though the
ecclesiastical state was indeed most pleasing to God, Saint Paul had envisaged the
Christian community as a body composed of different members with different
functions, none of which must be allowed to grow out of proportion to the others.
236TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Many convents were founded to serve the vainglory of their patrons, and many
chantry priests could hardly manage on the pittance they were paid, having to
take ‘menial jobs’. Indeed, from the last third of the sixteenth century the Cortes
tried to apply some brake to the foundation of new convents, in a time when
‘these realms have a smaller population and people are worse off ’. 53
According to the census of 1591 there were 33,087 parish and chantry priests,
20,697 monks and friars, and 20,369 nuns in Castile—equivalent to about 1.5 per
cent of the population at the time. 54 There was some imbalance between regions.
Of Catalonia its geographer Pere Gil (1551–1622) wrote proudly: ‘Many Catalans
become friars and priests, and, all things considered, there is no realm in Spain or
Italy or France which, with the same number of households as Catalonia, has as
many clergy as it.’ But it was above all in the towns that the first estate was concentrated:
2,000 priests and friars in the city of Valencia—‘as well as the nuns, who are countless’
—according to the chronicler Escolano, for a population of about 50,000 souls;
and about 1,400 friars and nuns and 400–500 priests in Toledo, where the population
was similar, in 1575. 55 Many of these, believed the Council of Castile in 1660,
had little vocation, placed in religion by their parents, who transferred nominal
ownership of their land to them in order to benefit from tax immunities. Secular
priests had to have some property, as laid down by the Council of Trent, in order
to avoid the proliferation of ‘hedge priests’ who had plagued the medieval church.
But the level—at around 40 or 50 ducats a year—was less than the annual income
of a wage-labourer. It was, however, the friars who were accused of recruiting too
many of the poor, placed in convents by their parents after they had acquired a
smattering of grammar, in order to ‘free them from the cares of this world’ —
according to one government minister in 1683. 56 By contrast, nuns had to bring a
dowry on entering a convent, and there were frequent complaints in the Cortes
that the level was too high. On the other hand, the 2,000 ducats which the Madrid
patricians gave their daughters when they took the veil was a fraction—about a
tenth—of what they would have had to provide had they married. 57
Obviously a mixture of motives—economic and cultural—shaped the thinking
of families in this matter. Esteban de Garibay recounted how he had orientated
his eldest son Luis, born in 1581, towards a clerical career. Set to primary school
at age six, when ‘he became fairly good at reading and writing, and at prayers and
the catechism, I decided to have him receive the first tonsure so that I could get
him some ecclesiastical funding for his further study’. Many people held the first
tonsure—set apart as ‘clerks’, under the jurisdiction of the church courts and forbidden
to marry—who had no intention of becoming ordained priests. Luis received his
at age ten, and a couple of years later (1593) went to the Jesuit grammar school in
Madrid. ‘He keeps saying he wants to be a clergyman, and that’s what I want, so
that he may serve God in the priestly state, and be a protector for his brothers
and sisters, since he is the eldest.’ 58
The clergy were inevitably a mixed bunch, given their sheer numbers and the
diversity of motives which had brought them to where they were. The great poets
237TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
and playwrights of the Golden Age who became priests, sometimes late in life —
Lope de Vega, Góngora, Calderón—suggest at once the pervasive currents of spirituality
of the time, and the contamination of the spiritual ideal by worldly concerns. The
parish clergy seem often to have been local men—a fifth of the vicars and rectors in
the diocese of Cuenca were appointed to their native village, and another quarter
to within 30 kilometres of it. 59 These curas often stayed a long time in the same
place, if not particularly zealous at preaching or guiding consciences, at least providing
a framework for the Christian life which can still be glimpsed through their records,
year after year, of the baptisms, marriages and burials of their flock. The chantry
priest of Valencia, Mossèn Porcar, keeps us informed through his diary of the life of
a community. He had grown up in the city and was thirty-five before he got his
benefice in 1595. For Porcar religion was a round of devotions and processions
which brought together a community he knew so well in its secular aspects as well.
We find him chatting to fishwives in the spring of 1625 about the high price of
lobster that season. From the fish-stalls (after morning mass) to the market and
then across the river to the viceroy’s palace, where throngs of litigants and curiosity-
seekers gathered to await the arrival of the mail from Madrid, this seems to have
been the daily itinerary which would provide him with the gossip which he would
then write up in his diary. He had books in his house, and some interest in the
topography and archaeology of his neighbourhood. He was, above all perhaps, a
man of the people—concerned by pirate raids from North Africa rather than by
remote wars against ‘Lutherans’ in northern Europe, bitter against nobles and prelates
who sold out the people and voted taxes on food to pay for crusades abroad.
One thing that emerges clearly from his diary is how closely everyday life
was bound up with religion—but a religion which took account of the natural
harmony of the seasons rather than of official dogma. Work seems to have been
interrupted for lunch when the sun was at its height (perhaps one or two of the
clock), and people would begin to gather indoors for cards and conversation
when bells rang out for vespers (at the fifth or sixth hour after high noon, corresponding
to around seven o’clock nowadays). The curfew bell, summoning people to pause
and say a prayer for the souls of the dead, rang at the eighth hour (say, nine or
ten by today’s clock). Clocks were coming in, but the governor of Llombai wrote
still of that village in 1756, ‘there is not even a clock to regulate the day and the
night’. 60 Only the tolling of the bells at the canonical hours marked out time,
somewhat like the call of the muezzin to prayer five times a day in Muslim
countries. The contrast between hours of daylight and darkness was, of course,
very striking, and the greatest festivities were signalled by the blaze of torches
hung from every balcony or window—the luminarias—which momentarily turned
night into day.
The visibility of the heavens in the normally long hours of darkness must have
fostered the prevalent belief in their influence on the affairs of this world. Chroniclers
like Bermúdez de Pedraza or Escolano, priests though they were, knew that the
stars played a role in the fortunes of a city and the character of its inhabitants.
238TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Though the church had forbidden the belief that the fate of individuals was fixed
by the stars (1583), one of the most popular almanacs of the time affirmed that
men’s destinies were indeed ‘guided’ by them. 61 Lope de Deza in his classic treatise
of 1618 on agriculture was sure that the heavens announced good or bad years
ahead for the farmer. The jurist López Bravo agreed that the farmer and also the
doctor of medicine would want to consult the zodiac before acting; but those who
predicted the fate of a particular individual or stirred up fear of famine by their
prognostications were to be condemned. 62 Laws of 1410 and 1598 outlawed the
foretelling of the future through crystal-gazing or watching the flight of birds or
in other ways, on pain of death—‘and let the justices have this ordinance read in
public, preceded by the ringing of a bell, once every month on market day’. Castillo
de Bobadilla noted that there were cunning folk who were consulted ‘about thefts,
births and other matters not relating to agriculture or shipping or medicine’. Such
‘sorcerers, diviners and seers’ were to be punished by either the secular or the
ecclesiastical courts. The black witch, the bruja, guilty of invoking the aid of Satan,
would have to be left to the Inquisition, as would ‘charmers’ who meddled with
the sacred, getting holy images ‘to weep or perspire ...in order to deceive the
public and get money’. 63
Spain, like Italy, was relatively free of the witch-craze sweeping early modern
Europe. There were, indeed, panics from time to time—in Catalonia in 1622, for
example, where the loss of crops through hailstones motivated a spate of accusations
against persons, who were also blamed for the death of infants and of cattle. As
the government recognised, once the ball started rolling, it had a momentum of
its own: ‘there is no town or village which has not started investigating whether it
has any [witches] in its own district’. It was also concerned a few years later that
these local investigations were linking up with feuds, ‘as one side tries maliciously
to get even and besmirch the other with this crime’. The caution of the central
government was matched by that of the church hierarchy. The bishop of Solsona,
in reply to a general enquiry by the ministers of Charles I I on the situation in
Catalonia in the later seventeenth century, gave his opinion that ‘this matter of
witches is a most difficult one’. He had had one witch-finder gaoled for wild accusations.
Even when the accused persons confessed, little reliance could be placed on their
testimony: ‘they confess under threat of torture, and many die without being guilty’. 64
In fact, the Inquisition had the power of evoking some of these cases to itself, but
the limits of its jurisdiction were not entirely clear. One ‘white witch’ in Toledo in
1594 was sentenced by the corregidor to whipping and perpetual banishment from
town for making love-potions and curing a child with a parchment inscribed with
crosses. The latter offence interested the Inquisition, which demanded her to be
surrendered to it—fortunately for her, since her banishment was reduced to just
six years, though she was required now to abjure formally of ‘slight suspicion’ of
heresy at a private mass in its audience chamber. In Galicia such cases of witchcraft
were generally treated in a similar way, as superstitions which smacked of heresy
and required a formal protestation of innocence (that is, the so-called ‘abjuration’),
239TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
rather than as formal heresies or pacts with the Devil, which would require recantation,
or ‘reconciliation’ with the church. 65
The dividing-line between good and bad magic must anyway have been hard
to draw in a society which paid great attention to the prophet and the visionary.
The black slave girl, Catalina Muñoz, was sentenced by the Inquisition of Valencia
to reconciliation in 1588, involving gaol for life and confiscation of her property,
for having made a pact with the Devil in order to work miracles. For a time she
had deceived much of the city, including Archbishop Ribera, into believing that
her gifts were of divine origin. 66 The proximity of the supernatural was a major
factor in orthodox belief. Some of the classics of medieval literature—the thirteenth-
century Cantigas de Santa María, or the Milagros de Nuestra Señora by Gonzalo de
Berceo, speak of the intervention of Our Lady and of her son on behalf of sinful
man, setting aside the natural order in return for devotion to their cause. The
miracle was what tended to remain in the popular memory after the ethical
teaching of an evangelist had faded—as in the stories told about the fifteenth-
century preacher, Saint Vincent Ferrer, which live on in the street theatre of
Valencia and emphasise his communication with the divine through the wonders
he worked.
The miracle, after all, provided some hope in a world lacking alternative means
of protecting itself against the hazards of nature. Recording the birth of their first
son in 1598 after numerous miscarriages, Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola noted how
his anxious wife ‘commended herself to the glorious Saint Raymond (de Penyafort?)
and swallowed some earth from his tomb’. After the safe delivery, he burst out in a
paean of praise to all the saints in heaven who had interceded for him with Christ,
who thus ‘would not punish my child as my sins deserve’. 67 The chronicler of Toledo
in 1617 devoted many pages to the miracles performed on the sick, especially on
those ‘given up as hopeless by the doctors’. A cape from a statue of the Virgin, for
example, would be placed over the patient, or children laid on the steps of the altar
where her image was venerated. 68 The Dominican friar Gavaldá, who played such
an active part in combating the plague of 1647 in Valencia, summed up the conventional
wisdom: ‘Much was owed to human prudence, but if it had not been helped along
by greater powers, vigilance would have achieved little.’
The great enquiry conducted by Philip I I’s government into the way of life of
the Castilian peasantry in 1575 throws much light on these forms of popular devotion.
Faced by disease or famine, villages would commend themselves by a collective
decision to a particular saint, chosen sometimes by lot from within a list of likely
candidates, or by lighting several candles and choosing the name given to the one
which burned longest. In thanksgiving the village would celebrate an annual caridad
or fellowship ritual, involving communal feasting and distribution of food to the
poor. Sometimes the exact cause of the original vow was forgotten, and only the
festival remained. 69 Retorting to the Protestants, the Sevillian essayist Pedro de
Luxán noted in 1550: ‘It is no lack of breeding nor indeed of prudence for a man
who is going to negotiate with the king to ask his chamberlain to put in a good
240TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
word for him and attend when he is making his petition.’ The saints as such had
no power, but their merits were pleasing to God, and since they had themselves
walked this earth, they felt love and pity for humankind. Thus, the Cortes of
Valencia, pressing for the canonisation of several recently dead Valencians, spoke
of how ‘with their exemplary lives and holy deaths, they have shed lustre on this
realm, and, what is more, having lived and died within it, they will intercede with
his Divine Majesty that he may favour the said kingdom at every opportunity and
in all its needs’. 70
The political use of saints was important. Among the ‘high secrets of government’
outlined by the political theorist López Bravo in 1627, was the importance for the
ruler of identifying himself with the devotions of his subjects. Though, unlike the
masses, ‘he is not taken in by the fables...which greed for fame or dominion invented
in more barbarous times’, nevertheless he would benefit from his association with
the patriotism which they often conveyed. 71 But perhaps Spain failed to achieve the
kind of cultural integration envisaged by López Bravo. The national saint of Castile,
Saint James ‘the Moorslayer’, whose cult had presided over much of the Reconquest,
had to take second place in the Crown of Aragon to that other patron of the crusade,
Saint George, who had appeared to the Christian armies fighting outside Valencia
in 1238. And it was the thirteenth-century canon lawyer, Saint Raymond of Penyafort,
adviser to the old kings of Aragon, whom the ministers of the Crown of Aragon
honoured as their patron in solemn procession through the streets of the Spanish
capital. The commemoration of the victory of Lepanto over the Turk (7 October
1571), though the subject of a famous canvas by El Greco, was left largely in the
hands of the church. Rather than celebrating the virtues of the monarch, therefore,
it tended to become a religious fiesta. The Valencian priest Porcar noted in his
diary in the early seventeenth century how it was being assimilated by the Dominicans
to their own cult of the Holy Rosary (4 October). The contrast with England at this
time could hardly be greater, where, as David Cressy notes, the celebration of the
safe accession of Queen Elizabeth and the discovery of the Gunpowder Plot (17 and
5 November) were becoming great national holidays. ‘Bells and bonfires’ gave the
ordinary Englishman a sense of belonging to a Protestant nation.
At most, the Spanish kings did try to latch on to existing cults—often local —
and to promote them. The classic example is the way they adopted some of the
popular devotions of Madrid, those of Saint Isidore and Our Lady of Atocha,
referred to in an earlier chapter. And, of course, the cosmopolitanism of the Catholic
Church facilitated the migration of the holy. Thus Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola,
a Valencian in charge of the province of León, must have endeared himself to his
subjects by stopping in 1606 at their local shrine to Our Lady of the Wayside to
say a prayer for the recovery of his son from sickness. But, as against this, one has
to set the potentially disruptive effects of religious patriotism. Thus, a riot broke
out in Font d’En Carròs (Valencia) in 1601, when its feudal lord sought to remove
a venerated image of Our Lady. Armed forces had to be sent in to punish the
local aldermen. 72
241TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Visions and healing power could be associated with people who seemed to threaten
rather than strengthen good order in church and state. The twenty-one-year-old Lucrecia
de León, daughter of a Madrid notary, was tried by the Inquisition in 1590 for her
‘dreams’, which foretold the punishment to befall Spain for the extortions practised
by the king, Philip II. She became widely popular after foretelling the defeat of the
Armada, and attracted some powerful members of the elite into her circle. After a
lengthy investigation the Inquisition decided, given among other things her character
(she had an illegitimate child), that her dreams must be either invention or of diabolical
rather than divine origin, and sentenced her in 1595 to abjure de levi (from slight
suspicion of heresy), to a hundred lashes and to reclusion for a couple of years in a
convent. 73 Thanks to the Inquisition, it was becoming more difficult for popular visionaries
to establish a hold during this period. The trials suggest the enormous temptation to
claim links with the supernatural, though. Thus, in 1523 one twenty-five-year-old
woman, the wife of a carder, said that she had seen the Virgin Mary appear on a rock
outside her house one night. The village women assembled, and one of their sick
children was cured by kissing the spot. The parish priest advised the woman to keep
quiet in case the vision was the work of the Devil, and the Inquisition soon intervened.
Finding that the visionary was not particularly devout, and that her evidence was
unpersuasive, it sentenced her to one hundred lashes. 74
One of the most dangerous threats to Inquisition authority arose in Valencia
between 1612 and 1619, over the folk saint Mossèn Francesc Jeroni Simó. Orphaned
son of an immigrant French carpenter, he had got an education through the patronage
of various people, obtaining a benefice in the rather dangerous parish church of
Sant Andreu—dangerous because it was in the district of the fishermen (one of the
few trades not regulated by guilds) and near the university, where student rags
and riots were a recurring feature of life. Father Simó’s early death at the age of
thirty-three in 1612 sent shock-waves through a city reeling at this very time from
a confrontation between the artisan assembly and the jurats over new taxes to
stave off municipal bankruptcy. During the three days in which the body was
exposed after death (25–27 April), many cures were reported of the blind, deaf
and lame, and great crowds, including the viceroy, turned out for the funeral.
Gifts poured in over the next few months from the guilds and the peasants in
order to construct a shrine for the dead hero, with individual communities contributing
their special product—whether it be limestone, silk, bricks or whatever—in grandiose
and colourful processions headed by their musicians. Some of the clergy encouraged
the devotion—notably the Jesuits and the stricter orders of Franciscans (Discalced
and Capuchins)—together with many of the elite. On 9 September 1612 the new
shrine in Sant Andreu was inaugurated, celebrated by three days of festivities and
illuminations, with enormous processions thenceforward bringing the city to a
halt as they wound their way through the market square every Friday morning
for prayers at Simó’s tomb. Following representations from the archbishop, Aliaga,
the Inquisition tried to curb the excesses of this popular devotion, ordering (1614–
5) that no more pictures were to be produced showing rays of light radiating from
242TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Simó’s head, and that his body must be removed from the altar and no more
masses said there, pending official investigations of his sanctity by Rome. Complicated
manouevres then ensued, with the jurats and the noble estate trying to get these
decrees suspended, warning of the risk of popular disturbances and using the
influence of the duke of Lerma, whose grandchild, accidentally smothered by the
wet-nurse, had been revived in 1614 by the application of a relic of Simó. It was
Lerma’s fall from power in 1618 which led the Inquisition to swing into action
again, on 3 March 1619, banning any further public cult of the dead priest. A riot
ensued: the secretary of the Holy Office had to take refuge in the sacristy of the
cathedral after reading out the decree at mass, and the crowd stoned the windows
of the archbishop’s palace and broke down the gates of the Dominican convent
(whose friars had led the campaign against the cult). The Inquisition had to agree
to suspend the decrees for three weeks, while desperate efforts were made by the
Crown to get the jurats and the nobility to use their influence to restore order. In
the event, Simó’s shrine was gradually dismantled, while the populace was assuaged
by promises that the authorities would make every effort to pursue official canonisation
proceedings in Rome. Pope Urban VII I’s order of 1628, for the Catholic world as
a whole, that canonisation proceedings were not to be started until fifty years
after an alleged saint had died, marked a decisive removal of sainthood from the
hands of the people into that of the hierarchy. And the control of the church over
popular spirituality received a further boost when Miguel de Molinos, envoy of
the Valencians to Rome to secure Simó’s canonisation, was condemned in 1687
for Quietism—the notion that through inner surrender of the soul to God one can
dispense with the discipline of the church. 75
Though the Counter-Reformation Church began to make life difficult for folk
saints, they were still to be found at the very end of the Old Regime. Fray Diego
José de Cádiz (1743–1801), the son of a junior army officer, entered the Capuchins
when he was fourteen. The English traveller Townsend saw him when he was at
the peak of his popularity, just after Easter 1787: ‘He would preach every night in
the main square [of Cartagena] to more than ten thousand people... The good
father is knowledgeable, eloquent and modest, and though the crowd attribute
various miracles to him, he makes no claim to that distinction...He was escorted
everywhere by a guard to prevent his habits being torn from him to make relics of
them.’ Old enemies would patch up their quarrels when they heard him speak,
but the audience was less impressed by his invitation to denounce even close kin
to the Inquisition if they were guilty of heresy. In fact, the Inquisition was more
concerned about pamphlets which were circulating with miraculous prayers which
Fray Diego had supposedly authorised against sickness or the evil eye. And the
government, though later grateful for his propaganda on behalf of the war against
godless France (1793–6), had to reprimand him for attacking its policy of ‘enlightened
self-interest’ as regards the economy. 76
A deep sense of community was one of the significant features of Spanish
Catholicism. In his testament of 1573 Don Luis de Requesens stressed his own
243TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
unworthiness and his hope for salvation in the mercy of Christ and—departing
at this point from Puritan ideas—the merits of the saints, particularly those depicted
on the altarpiece in his burial chapel in Barcelona, where chantry priests would
celebrate mass every day for the repose of his soul, and where nine paupers, to
be clothed every year on the eve of the commemoration of All Souls, were to be
invited to come and pray for him. The classic expression of this solidarity was
the confraternity, engaged in promoting good works and the collective salvation
of its members. Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola tells us in his diary that from the
time he was a child he had been enrolled by his parents in several of these, and
he recorded the consolation he felt in 1592 at the ‘infinite prayers’ being offered
up for his recovery from sickness by his fellows in the Confraternity of Saint
Peter Martyr. Though often these associations created new ties of solidarity,
occasionally they reinforced existing ones, as in 1591, when Bernardo joined
his wife, mother and some servants of the family in the Confraternity of the
Rosary, whose headquarters lay in the Basque Country, in the Dominican convent
in Vitoria. Many indulgences were accorded to members, he noted, ‘and many
miracles have been attested for women in childbirth’. 77
Confraternities were often class-specific. Thus, each trade had its own—a kind
of social counterpart to the guild, providing an extensive range of charitable and
spiritual benefits for its members. The feasting and conviviality associated with
them became increasingly suspect to the religious reformers of the sixteenth century,
and to economists at a later date. Fernández Navarrete believed there were too
many of these brotherhoods: ‘artisans spend half the year vying with one another
in display rather than in devotion’. 78 The Jesuits pioneered new forms, the ‘congregations’,
designed for the literate men and women who desired a deepening of their spiritual
life. Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola joined that of Valencia in 1600, but his spiritual
loyalties were perhaps already so widely dispersed that it is difficult to see much
of its influence in his diary.
Religion shaped human relationships and provided the basic framework for
living out one’s life. Just as the hours of the day were marked by the bells for
vespers or the souls of the deceased, so the seasons were graced by the red-letter
days of ritual celebration. Lope de Deza noted that the ploughing of the fallow
would usually be completed in New Castile by Saint John’s Day (24 June), before
the earth baked hard under the summer sun, while by Saint Andrew’s Day (30
November) the autumn ploughing would have to be done, before the rains and
snow made the soil unworkable again. Saint James’s Day (25 July) generally marked
the completion of the wheat harvest in New Castile, and the migrant reapers from
Galicia, where his great shrine lay at Compostela, would have time to celebrate as
they made ready for home. 79 Porcar gives a vivid insight into the frequency and
importance of these fiestas throughout the year in his native Valencia. After the
splendid processions of Holy Week 1617, culminating on Easter Day, 26 March,
there was the commemoration of Saint Vincent Ferrer on 3 April, with the suspension
of work that day and a week of celebration, including the famous miracle plays
244TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
mounted in the streets. On 23 April came Saint George’s Day, patron of the knights
of this crusader kingdom, and on 25 May Corpus Christi, followed by a week of
street theatre and processions. Work was suspended in the heat of summer, between
9 and 12 August, to commemorate Saint Lawrence and a papal jubilee. And the
autumn was marked by the usual celebrations commemorating Valencia’s capture
from the Moor (9 October), followed by a new public holiday that year, 19 October,
declared by the magistrates to honour a local hero, the Dominican friar Luis Beltrán
(died 1581 and beatified 1608, though not yet canonised as a saint).
The calendar was crowded with these red-letter days, in which the community
came together, displaying its finery and hierarchy in processions, investing its
ingenuity in the delicate and transient tableaux of flowers and wood which graced
the streets, decking the houses in competitive displays of luminarias by night, mounting
plays, bull-fights and the mock tournaments known as cañas. Fireworks and bonfires—
of which the modern Fallas in Valencia are a remote echo— completed the celebrations.
The pealing of the church bells added sound to the visual splendour. ‘They mingle
profanities with the divine ceremonies,’ commented the Venetian ambassador Soranzo
(1597–1602), ‘to the great amazement of those who are not used to seeing it,
maintaining here an old habit bequeathed to them by the Moriscos.’ In their religious
processions, ‘they jumble up masks, women, animals’, and with their hymns ‘they
mix in profane song, music and dancing, and even in church, right before the
Blessed Sacrament, costumed figures break into dance’. 80
Occasionally the profane seemed to take over. On the feast of Saint Nicholas
(6 December), as in many parts of Europe, a ‘boy bishop’ was elected—by the
cathedral schools often—exercising an authority which culminated, in the case of
Granada, on the Day of the Holy Innocents (28 December), when the students
took the seats of the canons in church and the archbishop, ‘standing, with head
uncovered’, attended as a choir-master. The first archbishop of Granada, Talavera,
‘was very fond of these ceremonies of humility’, which the chronicler, Bermúdez
de Pedraza, thought came ultimately from the Romans, ‘who in certain of their
feasts would elect and revere a slave as king’. 81 The rite of inversion no doubt
provided a useful safety-valve in a hierarchical society, but there was increasing
concern about what the Seville chronicler, Ortiz de Zúñiga, called ‘the pranks
which any gathering of young people is liable to get up to’ — pranks like the
plastering of the faces of those coming forward for ‘confirmation’ by the boy bishop
with ash mixed with flour (in Toledo, for example), or the riots in Seville in 1641
when the students tried to commandeer the carriages of nobles to escort their
‘bishop’ to the cathedral. 82 One by one these festivities were cut back, forbidding
the obispillo to parade through the streets of Seville on horseback after his election,
for example (1512), and then prohibiting his enthronement inside the cathedral
(1563), with similar steps being taken in the dioceses of Granada in 1526 and
Tarragona in 1565. 83
The most famous and enduring of these riotous festivities was carnival—the
celebration of the good life before the rigours of the Lenten fast purified the
245TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
soul at the beginning of each spring. In Valencia the students became active
from the end of January every year, dressing up, ringing bells and generally
engaging in a sort of rag through the streets. On 3 February 1627, however, the
grim sight of the Observant Franciscans processing with chains, their heads covered
with ashes and their mouths gagged with the cross-bones, begging God for an
end to that winter’s crippling drought, led the viceroy to ban carousing, and on
Shrove Tuesday (16 February) to forbid the habitual pelting of passers-by with
water-filled oranges. 84 The town council of Barcelona banned carnival on nine
occasions between the mid-sixteenth and mid-seventeenth century, because of
‘many fights, quarrels, woundings, deaths...’. And the authorities intervened
increasingly in other Catalan towns as well to stop celebrations—as in Girona in
1638, forbidding the fiestas in honour of the canonisation of Saint Narcís, in
view of the poor harvest, the risk of plague and the threat of a French invasion.
From such celebrations, argued the viceroy’s letter, ‘irreparable evils and scandals
usually flow, especially at the present time when hatreds have been so fanned
between powerful families’. 85 Ironically, perhaps, in view of all the precautions,
it was at Corpus Christi 1640, when the labourers began to gather in Barcelona
for the wheat harvest, that tensions with the government culminated and the
Catalans rose in revolt.
Fiestas, thought Castillo de Bobadilla, were often a waste of money and a threat
to public order, but they were a necessary desahogo—a relief or safety-valve—for
wilder spirits. It was, in fact, through controlling spectacle rather than abolishing
it that the church sought to get its message across. Some official fiestas failed to
take hold, though—like Archbishop Aliaga’s cult of the Holy Grail, preserved in
the cathedral of Valencia since 1437, but the object of public veneration through
street processions only from 1623. It was the aim of ecclesiastics to wean the
people away from their own, sometimes dubious folk saints to the contemplation
of the Christian mysteries, but this was only liable to work where it coincided
with some popular fervour. One of the most striking success stories in this regard
is the celebration of Holy Week, so much part of Spanish folklore now that great
numbers of tourists come to the country just to witness the elaborate street pageants.
Ortiz de Zúñiga believed that those of Seville had grown up in the wake of Saint
Vincent Ferrer’s preaching mission there in 1408.
The Holy Week processions, organised by brotherhoods and accompanied by
elaborate tableaux of Christ’s passion, were an unusually vivid blend of the sacred
and the profane. Joly described the flagellants who took part in those of Valladolid
in 1604: hooded figures, stripped to the waist, flogged themselves ‘to excess’, under
the blaze of torches and to the mournful notes of trumpets. Even nobles took part,
‘and had to be assisted home on the shoulders of others, bleeding and half dead’. 86
Joly was unsure of the religious effect: some were, no doubt, moved to repentance
by the spectacle, but there seemed to be much vainglory too—a criticism more strongly
voiced by the English clergyman Townsend in 1787. Porcar described two flagellants
striking an officer of the archbishop of Valencia, when he tried to confiscate their
246TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
scourges apparently because they were too sharp. More concern was voiced at the
‘theatricality’ of the event, at least as far as the spectators were concerned. For Holy
Week 1617 these were forbidden to sit in comfort on chairs or cushions, or to dress
up in ‘bright colours’.
Rivalling Holy Week in splendour was Corpus Christi, instituted as an official
holiday throughout Christendom by Pope John XXII in 1316 in honour of the real
presence of Christ in the Eucharist. Escolano dated the great processions of Valencia
back to 1374. Originally an opportunity for the guilds to display their finery, it
came increasingly to be controlled by the authorities. The magistrates of Seville
spent a tenth of their annual budget on mounting the elaborate festivities. The
dragon and giants of old were now turned into representations of the Devil and
of ‘vices fleeing from the Blessed Sacrament’, noted Ortiz de Zúñiga in 1677, who
also commented on the declining participation of the trade guilds, their place occupied
by religious brotherhoods. Instead of the old ‘mystery plays’, with their emphasis
on ‘farce’, specially commissioned autos sacramentales took ‘moral stories and allegories
relating to the sacrament of the Eucharist’ to the people by means of street theatre. 87
Some of the most precious of these come from the pen of Calderón in the third
quarter of the sevententeenth century, written for the public of Madrid. They describe
in the form of allegory the meaningless of the hierarchy of this world; the true
worth of the pauper and the prince can only be gauged in the next life. Like the
wafer of bread venerated by the crowds, physical appearance was deceptive. It was
a powerful message, at once subversive and yet ultimately conservative, in the way
of all rituals of inversion.
In 1638, surveying the lapse of Granadan Christians to Islam after the Arab
invasion of the eighth century, the chronicler Bermúdez de Pedraza suggested that
the phenomenon was hardly surprising. Look now at the Alpujarras, he suggested.
Resettled by Christians after the expulsion of the Moriscos in 1570, ‘they are in
many places, for lack of instructors...and because of an excess of hardships, so
ignorant...that they barely retain any vestiges of Christianity’. Shortly before, the
reformer Sancho de Moncada had left a legacy in his will of 1631 for catechisms,
prints and ‘knick-knacks’ (niñerías) which might attract the children of his native
Toledo to the Christian schools—‘for it is heart-breaking to see the want of instruction
in the hill country round about’. In the Valle de Lecrín near Granada in 1590 the
indefatigable Jesuit missionary Pedro de León commented: ‘It had been more than
twenty years since they had heard a sermon or a homily or the catechism. Most of
these are small villages, where no preacher is brought in, not even for the Bull of
Crusade...’ 88 Thanks in part to the efforts of preachers like Father León, thanks to
the gradual control of saints and fiestas by the authorities, thanks too to the relentless
pursuit of popular ‘superstitions’ by the Inquisition from the later sixteenth century,
it is clear that Spain by 1700 was more of a Christian community than it had been
before. The parish framework, which had failed the Moriscos, was increasingly
efficient by the middle of the seventeenth century, as one can see from the registers
which survive, covering all aspects of the Christian life from the cradle to the grave.
247TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
Before 1550 40 per cent of those interrogated by the Inquisition of Toledo could
recite satisfactorily the basic Christian prayers—the Creed, the Pater Noster, the
Ave Maria and the Salve Regina; by 1650, this had risen to 82 per cent. 89
Yet, as this achievement became a reality, the definition of the ‘godly commonwealth’
itself was beginning to change, as more emphasis was put on good citizenship rather
than on storming the heavens with prayer. ‘Building bridges, making roads’ is a ‘pious
work’ as good as any other, commented Ponz at the end of the Old Regime, as he
gave reference after reference to bishops setting up workshops, distributing spindles,
wool and flax to the poor. He cited with approval the letter of the archbishop of
Toledo to the priests of his diocese in 1779, urging them to take an interest in the
material welfare of their parishioners. 90 His great friend Jovellanos, in his treatise of
1795 on economic reform, doubted whether the church needed so many friars (or
chantry priests) as in the Middle Ages. The aim should be a well-educated pastoral
clergy, acting as guides to their flock. And the enlightened statesman Campomanes,
in his treatise of 1774 on manufactures, had suggested there were too many fiestas. In
addition to the fifty-two Sundays of the year, there were forty-three other holidays,
the most congested months being December and May with seven each, followed by
August with five. In addition, there were other local saint’s days and customary pilgrimages
to their shrines— ‘during which, in addition to the loss of work that day, many expenses
are caused to a family, not to mention the frequent disorders and even homicides
which occur’. 91
In 1782 Jovellanos gave a vivid insight into the three four-day pilgrimages of his
native Asturias. Since there were no theatres or bull-fights in the villages, the peasants
indulged in these forays to a sacred location in the countryside, usually in the summer
months. Near the shrine, ‘they place the tents round about, their provisions, their
barrels of cider and wine...’. Bonfires, music, dancing, feasting created a jovial atmosphere:
‘these are usually the only opportunities courting couples have to see and talk to
each other’. Meanwhile, their elders did business: ‘each pilgrimage becomes a kind
of fair, where cattle are sold, along with clothes and jewellery, accounting for virtually
all the domestic trade of this region outside the weekly markets’. He thought misguided
the censoriousness of some authorities —not least the church itself, which tried in
the Synod of Oviedo (1769) to restrict the licentiousness of the pilgrimage. ‘Music,
dancing, carousing are in a sense bound up with the religion of ancient peoples.’
And, after all, the pueblo needs the opportunity to let off steam from time to time—
though the shrines, often at the boundaries of different communities, were flash-
points of rivalry between them. 92 How sensible of the Catholic Church, thought his
correspondent Ponz, to allow these cults to continue. Referring to the shrine of Our
Lady near Talavera de la Reina, he remarked on the elaborate wreaths woven in
her honour, which probably dated back to the cult of some earth goddess. ‘Perhaps
the difficulty of uprooting it caused the bishops to convert the custom into an offering
to Our Lady, as the church has wisely done with other pagan rites.’ 93
The imaginative flair of Jovellanos and Ponz prefigured the insights of Romanticism.
But the last stages of the Old Regime were marked rather by a desire to uproot
248TH E COMMU NITY OF TH E FAITHFUL
popular customs and to create a more disciplined, more hard-working citizenry.
Though in a sense the ministers of the Enlightenment were merely carrying forward
the reforming programme of the Counter-Reformation—seeking to crack down on
immorality and superstition and thereby safeguarding ‘true religion’ —they were
ultimately on a collision course with the church. Floridablanca, as Secretary of State,
issued a circular to the bishops in 1777 ordering them to have plans for church
buildings submitted first to the Royal Academy of Art. Wood was to be avoided as
far as possible in altarpieces, because of the fire hazard. Fire could be avoided, the
prelates were lectured, ‘if the number of candles could be reduced to the limit required
by the aesthetic needs of the temple and dictated by serious-minded devotion’. 94
This kind of detailed regulation was rather typical of the mentality of Benevolent
Despotism, and symbolised the fact that there was no longer room in the one commonwealth
for two different ideas of the nature and function of the citizen.
Already in the 1650s Martínez de Mata had signalled the shift with his call
for greater attention to the economy if the decline of Spain were to be arrested.
‘The kind of devotion which consists of friars flogging themselves, nuns fasting
and people coming out in processions’ would not help the commonwealth.
God had made this world of matter, with which mortal man would have to
learn to work. 95 Government measures to liberalise the economy—to install
the regime of enlightened self-interest—took a decisive step forwards when
Campomanes freed the grain trade in 1765. It was the mentality underlying
this abandonment of the notion of a just price which would later fuel Fray
Diego de Cádiz’s attack on the new economic thinkers. Meanwhile, it was
accompanied—almost paradoxically it would seem—by a determination on the
part of the government to act as moral counsellor to the people. Campomanes
was to pay considerable attention to dress and cleanliness as part of the new
artisan he envisaged in his great treatise of 1775 —a God-fearing but rational
citizen, devoted to work rather than fiesta, avoiding taverns and gambling. It
was little surprise, therefore, when the government introduced decrees in 1766
forbidding people to wear slouch hats (they must adopt the smart tricorne) or
to wrap themselves up in the long, flowing Spanish cape. Through a combination
of hunger and resentment at having their capes cut in half by the police with
ruling measures and scissors, the people of Madrid erupted in March 1766 in
one of the most serious outbreaks of rioting to shake the Old Regime. The
trouble—which quickly spread to other Spanish cities—was eventually mastered.
But the search for scapegoats led the enquiring minister, Campomanes, to pick
on the Jesuits. Whether they had any hand in the riot or not —and the evidence
was far from conclusive—their victimisation and expulsion from Spain in 1767
were surely inevitable developments in the long run. For though they represented
much of what the reformers had been trying to achieve— a better-educated
laity, a more moral citizenry—their organisation and continuing commitment
to the old ways were ultimately incompatible with the new Spain which the
Enlightenment was trying to create.
249CONCLUSION
In one of his short stories which seek to capture the character of Castile, the writer
Azorín (1874–1967) conjures up for us the small town of the high plateau as it might
be glimpsed by an observer from the top of the cathedral tower around 1500. A
cloud of dust on the approaches to the gates heralds the arrival of a lord and his
troupe of pages and lackeys. The countryside is open range, grazed by flocks of
sheep which will head south in winter on their great annual migrations. Near the
river are numerous tanneries and a mill for fulling cloth. Inside the walls, the city is
a labyrinth of streets, each echoing to the cries and songs of its particular craftsmen,
who work away in the porches of their houses. Amid the clamour of bells, friars and
nuns make their rounds, and a blind man begs for alms, intoning psalms and offering
householders ‘secret remedies...for all kinds of pain and mortal crises’. News is just
beginning to filter in of great discoveries beyond the ocean, of the rediscovery of
ancient worlds, of the new opportunities for those who can read and write. Meanwhile,
a knight (to whom Don Quixote will later bear a family resemblance) sits in pensive
melancholy in a great house overlooking the square.
Azorín shifts our gaze to the same scene in 1800. The woods round the town
have been felled, and the pastures and herds have diminished; in their place are
fields of wheat and market-gardens. On the road where the lord and his equipage
once rode, now there is a stage-coach, hurtling along, trying to arrive at the same
time every day of the week; ‘of the old trades of leather and wool, almost all have
disappeared’ (victims of the new markets and routes). The blind man chants still
his charms and prayers, but the friars and nuns are not so visible, and the news
now is of a ‘tremendous revolution’, which has led a king and a queen to the
guillotine, and of the promulgation of laws ‘in which it is proclaimed that all
human beings are free and equal’. Everywhere newspapers and books spread the
expectation of change. Still, in the great house overlooking the square there sits in
pensive melancholy a gentleman—clean-shaven now, a round-faced bourgeois rather
than a wild-eyed cavalier. 1
Azorín’s story is concerned with the continuity of the human dilemma and the
ultimate loneliness of the individual amid the bustle of change in the world around
him. It is, however, the background noise—the relationship of the individual to
250CONCLU S ION
his fellows—that ultimately interests the historian. How significant were the changes,
how significant the continuity in Spain between 1500 and 1800? For the political
historian there is the undoubted drama of the ascent to empire of one of the more
marginal countries in Europe, and the long, melancholy retreat from the summits
of power by a giant who was found, after all, to have feet of clay. Social history
lacks some of the clarity of this analytical and chronological framework. But one
could suggest that between 1500 and 1800, underneath the theatre of high politics,
a certain ‘Spain’ was slowly and quietly taking shape—through the internal colonisation
of a relatively empty, frontier land, and through the forging of a stable commonwealth.
In view of the turmoil of Spanish history in the Middle Ages and in modern
times, the latter achievement—so basic to all social development—merits particular
emphasis.
The development was taking place against a background of crisis in Europe
generally. The concept of the ‘Seventeenth-Century Crisis’ seems as slippery and
as indispensable as that of feudalism. It reflects that caesura in European history
between the optimism of the Renaissance and that of the Enlightenment. Those
twisted, turbulent years between, say, 1550 and 1750, are overshadowed by hunger,
bubonic plague, bonfires of witches and heretics, wars of religion. ‘The Age of
Iron’ for Cervantes, the ‘Age of Copper’ for his contemporary Bermúdez de Pedraza
(1638) is a paradox in the history of Spain as in that of Europe as a whole, for it
seems to combine within it—not unlike the history of our own times— great fear
and great progress, poverty and prosperity, regression to barbarism and the building
of a more civilised world. Valencia, Barcelona, Madrid were probably more safe,
more comfortable places in which to live in 1700 than in 1500. Despite the apparent
loss of power by the bankrupt Habsburg monarchy during the seventeenth century
and its sale of feudal jurisdictions to its nobility, there was to be no return to the
anarchy of the fifteenth century. Rather, the steady growth of a well-policed society,
with a certain degree of equality of all citizens before the law, was to attract the
admiration of foreign observers.
The relationship between political structures and economic development has
long interested historians, with greater emphasis now being put on the relative autonomy
of the political process—in the sense that it is not seen as being determined by prior
economic change. 2 Rather, the distribution of power critically affects the economy—
for example, in the attention paid to safeguarding routes and markets, or in the
fairness or otherwise of the way taxes are levied and allocated. One of the aspects
of the seventeenth-century crisis in Spain as in the rest of Europe seems to have
been a remodelling of the state. It would surely be misleading to speak of a retreat
of the central authority and a surrender of power to local oligarchies, without pointing
out that this surrender depended on a refashioning of the social hierarchy and of
social attitudes, which meant that the oligarchies were more tightly integrated with
the state than before. An analogy presents itself with modern times: just as governments
today are beginning to find that their commitments to welfare and education have
outrun their capacity to administer or fund them, and just as they are preparing to
251CONCLU S ION
‘enfeoff’ private groups with much of the responsibility (but under more supervision,
paradoxically, than ever before), so the seventeenth-century monarchy in Spain and
Europe found its military obligations growing so fast that they required a ‘fiscal
partnership’ with mighty subjects—who were never allowed, though, to become ‘over-
mighty’ again in the way their ancestors had been. One step backwards and two
steps forwards seems to summarise seventeenth-century developments. They created
an ordered but decentralised political commonwealth in Spain.
That community attracted, as we have noted, much foreign admiration, and it
guaranteed the security of the citizen within which the internal colonisation of the
country could be completed. But there was a price to be paid. In the age of empire,
and despite access to the silver of Mexico and Peru, Spain remained a land of small-
scale communities, like the one described by Azorín. Compared with England in
the seventeenth century, one notes a marked absence of that fiscal and cultural
integration, which was to lay the foundations of imperial success and social transformation.
The philosopher John Locke summed up around 1690 the fundamental dilemma
which was to afflict continental monarchies: that their concentration of power might
guarantee political tranquillity for a time, but they could never achieve fiscal stability
because they were not to be trusted when it came to property and taxes. Lisón’s
debate with Olivares in 1622 had been on just this question.
Spain might have continued for many generations with the forms of attenuated
decentralisation—or regulated corporatism—built up in the seventeenth century.
In his immortal tale, The Three-Cornered Hat (an indirect allusion to the riots of
1766 over the ‘Europeanisation’ of Spanish customs and dress), the writer Pedro
Antonio de Alarcón (1833–91) described the small-town atmosphere of the kingdom
of Granada, where he had grown up, as it must have been on the eve of the
Napoleonic invasion of 1808. ‘Once a week (or twice at most), the mail would
arrive from Madrid in most of the important towns of the peninsula,’ carrying the
government gazette which would tell of ‘whether there was one state more or one
state less north of the Pyrenees.’ For the Spaniard who could read, it hardly mattered:
the wars of Napoleon were talked about ‘as if they were about a hero from a novel
of chivalry, or were about things that were happening on another planet’. People
got on with their own lives—‘living in the old Spanish manner, which is to say
taking their time, and holding fast to the ancient ways...’. David Ringrose has
pointed out that the ‘old Spanish manner’ was, in fact, changing: a great growth
of population and of economic production characterised the country in the last
generations of the Old Regime, and he argues that this was transforming the society
anyway, and would go on to do so during the nineteenth century. 3 From his analysis
it would rather appear that the political upheavals which marked the advent of
liberalism, overthrowing the absolute monarchy, the church and the aristocracy,
were hardly necessary, since a ‘bourgeoisie’ was taking shape in any event as the
guiding hand in the destinies of the nation.
Certainly there is an element of chance in the collapse of the old regime—the
Napoleonic invasion of Spain in 1808, the bitter war of liberation which followed,
252CONCLU S ION
the inability of the restored Bourbons in 1814 to master the fiscal crisis which
ensued from the independence of the American colonies at this time. Josep Fontana
has argued persuasively that the ‘bankruptcy’ of the old regime, if in part a historical
accident, reflected a more enduring problem of the relationship between the government
and its subjects. The inefficient superstructure of absolutism, with its parasitic
noble and clerical elites, could only be tolerated for as long as the windfall profits
from Mexican silver and South American entrepôt trade were available. Once
they had gone, the battle for revenue between government and Spanish tax-payer
would have to be fought out in earnest—with all the implications that brought, of
tax-raising parliaments, release of entailed lands of feudal and clerical landlords,
and freedom of debate. 4
The mutual influence of economic and political developments is one of the areas
of Spanish history currently attracting most research. But perhaps ultimately for
the social historian it is the way our ancestors perceived reality that is the interesting
thing. Their view was necessarily limited, but its very imperfections impose a sense
of humility on the observer, who has a god-like vantage point from which to survey
three centuries of development but must try to share some of the hopes and fears of
people struggling for twenty-five years at a time. The ideology of the old regime—
Catholicism, the family, chivalry—gave shape to many lives. The symptoms of change
were surely there in the questions which people began asking, in Spain as in other
parts of Europe, about the wisdom of some of these values, which in their day had
helped create an impressive form of society. We may leave the last word to the
Enlightened minister Campomanes. In his treatise of 1775 he addressed the problem
of the corporate structure of the old regime, the emphasis on hereditary honour
and privilege, rather than on individual application to productive work. When warfare
was the great occupation and defence the prime concern of a people, one might
understand this—as among the Moroccans still, who ‘just look after their horses and
plough strips of land one year here, another there’. But a modern nation ‘does not
count its might in an untrained horde, but in the general wealth of its people, which
helps maintain well disciplined and well provided armies’. For this purpose trade
and technology were as important as nobility of arms: ‘in any of these professions
one can acquire glory and fame; but in all of them...one has to respect the individual
who strives best’. 5 Here already, a generation before it collapsed, one of its foremost
servants was sounding the death-knell of the Spanish old regime.
